CHALLENGE STANDARDS Home Economics Careers and Technology Grades Nine Through Twelve C ALIFORNIA DEPARTMENT OF EDUC ATION · SACRAMENTO, 2000 DEP AR T EN TM OF ED U N T IO CA TE OF R FO C A LI Challenge Standards for Student Success: Home Economics Careers and Technology, Grades Nine Through Twelve was developed by the Home Economics Careers and Technology Unit, California Department of Education.
This publication was edited by Janet Lundin, working in cooperation with Janice DeBenedetti, Manager, and Paula Tripp, Consultant, Home Economics Careers and Technology Unit.
The cover and interior design were created by Cheryl McDonald and prepared by Paul Lee.
Typesetting was done by Carey Johnson and Gloria Barrerio.
It was published by the Department, 721 Capitol Mall, Sacramento, California (mailing address: P.O. Box 944272, Sacramento, CA 942442720).
It was distributed under the provisions of the Library Distribution Act and Government Code Section 11096.
© 2000 by the California Department of Education All rights reserved ISBN 0-8011-1507-8
Ordering Information A partial list of educational resources available from the Department appears on page 179.
In addition, an illustrated Educational Resources Catalog describing publications, videos, and other instructional media available from the Department can be obtained without charge by writing to the California Department of Education, CDE Press, Sales Office, P.O. Box 271, Sacramento, CA 95812-0271; FAX (916) 323-0823 or by calling the Sales Office at (916) 445-1260.
Notice The guidance in Challenge Standards for Student Success: Home Economics Careers and Technology, Grades Nine Through Twelve is not binding on local educational agencies or other entities.
Except for the statutes, regulations, and court decisions that are referenced herein, the document is exemplary, and compliance with it is not mandatory.
(See Education Code Section 33308.5.)
N
ST
A
IA
Publishing Information
ii
Prepared for printing by CSEA members.
Contents Acknowledgments .......................................................................................................... vi Overview of Home Economics Careers and Technology Programs ...................
1 Home Economics Careers and Technology Program Components .................
Consumer and Family Studies ...................................................................
Home Economics Related Occupations ....................................................
FHA-HERO ...............................................................................................
2 2 2 2
Organization and Characteristics of the Content Standards ...........................
3 Use of the Content Standards ..........................................................................
4 Part I Consumer and Family Studies ...........................................................................
5 Overview of Consumer and Family Studies Programs .....................................
6 Organization and Characteristics of the Consumer and Family Studies Content Standards .........................................................
8 Use of the Consumer and Family Studies Content Standards ..................
9 Child Development and Guidance Content Area Standards .......................
Consumer Education Content Area Standards .............................................
Family Living and Parenting Education Content Area Standards ................
Fashion, Textiles, and Apparel Content Area Standards ..............................
Food and Nutrition Content Area Standards ................................................
Housing and Furnishings Content Area Standards .......................................
Individual and Family Health Content Area Standards ................................
Transferable and Employability Skills Content Area Standards ...................
10 16 21 26 32 39 44 49
Part II Home Economics Related Occupations ......................................................
53 Child Development and Education ............................................................
55 Overview of Child Development and Education ...........................................
56 Child Development and Education Program ..........................................
56 Characteristics and Use of the Content Standards .................................
57 Child Development and Education Career Pathway Standards ....................
59 Consumer Services .......................................................................................
69 Overview of Consumer Services ....................................................................
70 Consumer Services Program ....................................................................
70 Characteristics and Use of the Content Standards .................................
72 Consumer Services Career Pathway Standards ..............................................
73 iii
Family and Human Services ........................................................................
81 Overview of Family and Human Services ......................................................
Family and Human Services Program ......................................................
Characteristics and Use of the Content Standards .................................
Family and Human Services Career Pathway Standards ...............................
Overview of Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising ...............
Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising Program ...............
Characteristics and Use of the Content Standards .................................
Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising Career Pathway Standards ...................................................................................
82 82 84 85 96 96 97 99
Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising ................................
95
Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition .....................................................
111 Overview of Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition ...................................
Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition Program ...................................
Characteristics and Use of the Content Standards ...............................
Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition Career Pathway Standards ............
112 112 114 115
Food Service and Hospitality .....................................................................
125 Overview of Food Service and Hospitality ..................................................
Food Service and Hospitality Program ..................................................
Characteristics and Use of the Content Standards ...............................
Food Service and Hospitality Career Pathway Standards ............................
126 126 128 129
Hospitality, Tourism, and Recreation ......................................................
141 Overview of Hospitality, Tourism, and Recreation .....................................
Hospitality, Tourism, and Recreation Program .....................................
Characteristics and Use of the Content Standards ...............................
Hospitality, Tourism, and Recreation Career Pathway Standards ..............
Overview of Interior Design, Furnishings, and Maintenance ......................
Interior Design, Furnishings, and Maintenance Program .....................
Characteristics and Use of the Content Standards ...............................
Interior Design, Furnishings, and Maintenance Career Pathway Standards .................................................................................
Appendix 142 142 144 145 160 160 162 163
Interior Design, Furnishings, and Maintenence .......................................
159
Overview of the HECT Course Sequence, Grades Nine Through Twelve .....................................................................................
175
iv
List of Illustrations Chart 1.1 Chart 2.1 Chart 3.1 Chart 4.1 Chart 5.1 Chart 6.1 Chart 7.1 Chart 8.1 Chart 9.1 Chart 10.1 Chart A.1 Relationship of Content Areas to Career Pathways ..................
3 Home Economics Careers and Technology Education Career Pathway Options .............................................................
7 Child Development and Education Career Pathway Options .......................................................................
58 Consumer Services Career Pathway Options ...........................
71 Family and Human Services Career Pathway Options ............
83 Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising Career Pathway Options .......................................................................
98 Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition Career Pathway Options .....................................................................
113 Food Service and Hospitality Career Pathway Options .........
127 Hospitality, Tourism, and Recreation Career Pathway Options .........................................................
143 Interior Design, Furnishings, and Maintenance Career Pathway Options .....................................................................
161 Overview of Home Economics Careers and Technology Education Course Sequences, Grades Nine Through Twelve .....................................................................
176
v
Acknowledgments
Many teachers and administrators from districts, counties, and other agencies throughout the state have contributed to the development of the Home Economics Careers and Technology standards.
Many others have given generously of their time in making revisions and additions to the standards.
Consumer and Family Studies The following individuals are recognized for their valuable contributions to the Consumer and Family Studies standards: Clyle Alt, Bell Gardens High School, Bell Gardens Priscilla Burns, Pleasant Valley High School, Chico Alice Claibourne, Fairfield High School, Fairfield Ruth Clark, Livermore High School, Livermore Kelly Goughnour, Laguna Middle School, San Luis Obispo Susan Gutzman, W. E. Mitchell Middle School, Rancho Cordova Deborah Harvey, Amador Valley High School, Pleasanton Sue Hope, Lompoc High School, Lompoc Bonnie Jenuine, Carpinteria Middle School, Carpinteria Barbara Johnson, Watsonville High School, Watsonville Dorothy Juskalian, Fresno Unified School District, Fresno Aileen Matsuura, Paramount High School, Paramount Penny Niadna, Golden West High School, Visalia Susie Pendleton, Cerritos High School, Cerritos Pat Scott, Narbonne Senior High School, Harbor City
Home Economics Related Occupations The following individuals are recognized for their valuable contributions to the Home Economics Related Occupations standards: Child Development and Education Leroy Bollinger, Children's Learning Center, Clovis Karen Brualdi, Kennedy (John F.) Senior High School, Granada Hills Connie Dolarian, Home Economics Careers and Technology Professional Development Project, California State University, Fresno Alan Eisner, California State Department of Social Services, Culver City Patty Stanley, Yosemite Regional Occupational Program, Modesto
vi
Greg Uba, Centinella Children's Center, Los Angeles Susan Wasserman, California State University, Northridge Consumer Services Joann Driggers, Mt. San Antonio Community College, Walnut Mike Jones, Consumer Credit Counseling, Fresno Brett Levy, Gottschalks, Fresno Sharon Seiler, Save Mart Supermarkets, Modesto Robin Sharoa-Martin, Nikon, Inc., Los Angeles Family and Human Services Cliff Garupa, Fresno City College, Fresno Gary Malone, Fresno Metropolitan Regional Occupational Center and Program, Fresno Tonya Parker, Linking Education and Economic Development (LEED), Sacramento Paul Rempen, Residential Care Homes, San Jose Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising Christina Amaral, Orange Coast College, Costa Mesa Becky Carter, Rancho Bernardo High School, San Diego Nina Dilbeck, California State University, Fresno Brent Kauffman, Seattle Pacific Industries, Los Angeles Paula Tripp, Consultant, Davis Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition Lois Carson, Taco Bell Corporation, Irvine Karen Carter, Hunt-Wesson Foods, Inc., Fullerton Mary Jo Feeney, California Beef Council, Pleasanton Pam Fillmore, Fillmore and Associates, Fullerton Rosemary Mark, Culinary Consultant, Walnut Creek Food Service and Hospitality John Britto, San Joaquin Delta Community College, Stockton Tom Costello, University of San Francisco, San Francisco Marilynn Filbeck, California State University, Northridge Jon Greenwalt, Cooks Apprenticeship Coordinator, Granite Bay Bill Main, Bill Main Associates, Chico Morgan Mason, Mason and Nicastri Ltd., Santa Monica Joe Shaw, Riverside County Regional Occupational Program, Riverside Ruth Webber, Deli Council, Sausalito Hospitality, Tourism, and Recreation Bill Bailor, Paramount's Great America, Santa Clara Vickie Corderos, Lego Land, Carlsbad Cory Duarte, Cypress College, Cypress Peter Fuller, La Canada Country Club, La Canada Randy Kirschbaum, American Express, Marina Del Rey
vii
Anastasia O'Neill, Southwest Airlines, Los Angeles David Schweiger, Cypress College, Cypress Leslie Shenko, American Airlines Travel Academy, Houston Nancy Smith, The Bed and Breakfast Institute, Placerville Don St. Hilaire, California State Polytechnic University, Pomona Interior Design, Furnishings, and Maintenance Sarah Fretwell, Home Base, Long Beach Julie Paille, Fullerton College/Coastline Regional Occupational Program, Rancho Santa Margarita Judith Rand, Judith Rand Interiors, Santa Ana A special thank-you is extended to the additional 130 Home Economics Careers and Technology instructors and FHA-HERO advisors who provided recommendations for revision of the standards.
viii
1
Overview of Home Economics Careers and Technology Programs Preparing students for living in the twenty-first century and earning a living in careers representing California's key industries is the mission of Home Economics Careers and Technology (HECT) education.
HECT education prepares students to become positive, productive members of the workforce, families, and the community through two complementary instructional programs: Consumer and Family Studies (CFS) and Home Economics Related Occupations (HERO).
At the elementary school level, students begin developing an awareness of HECT education, including key topics in CFS and related careers.
In the middle grades, six through eight, courses provide an opportunity to explore personal life management skills and careers related to HECT.
At the high school level, CFS courses provide a foundation that enables students to pursue a career path option through a HERO program in one of eight areas.
These vocational and technical courses combine with academic courses to form a sequence of learning that supports rigorous, standards-driven instruction focusing on one or more career pathways.
Students apply classroom learning throughout the sequence in conjunction with work-based learning experiences in the home, community, and workplace.
HECT education uniquely links the application of science, technology, career-technical, and life management skills to prepare students for careers and for managing work and family roles.
Students who complete a HECT career pathway course sequence are well prepared to succeed in entry-level employment, career advancement, or advanced education in colleges or universities.
This document contains HECT content standards for grades nine through twelve for both CFS and HERO programs.
These standards reinforce, expand, and apply academic knowledge and skills.
2
Overview of Home Economics Careers and Technology Programs
Home Economics Careers and Technology Program Components HECT education includes three interlocking components: CFS, HERO, and FHA-HERO.
Instruction is designed to include the two complementary instructional programs that integrate FHA-HERO leadership and career development activities.
Chart 1.1, "Relationship of Content Areas to Career Pathways," illustrates the unique relationship between CFS content areas and HERO career path programs.
Consumer and Family Studies A Consumer and Family Studies (CFS) program equips students with life management, transferable, and employability skills through instruction and leadership development activities in seven content areas: child development and guidance; consumer education; family living and parenting education; fashion, textiles, and apparel; food and nutrition; housing and furnishings; and individual and family health.
This program focuses on preparing students to balance personal, family, and work responsibilities and provides beginning and specialized courses in the career pathways.
Home Economics Related Occupations Home Economics Related Occupations (HERO) programs are the capstone courses designed to prepare students for careers in eight pathways: child development and education; consumer services; family and human services; fashion design, manufacturing, and merchandising; food science, dietetics, and nutrition; food service and hospitality; hospitality, tourism, and recreation; and interior design, furnishings, and maintenance.
These career pathways reflect the labor market needs of California's major industries in the twenty-first century.
FHA-HERO FHA-HERO is the pre-professional organization for HECT students that is integral to both instructional programs.
FHA-HERO provides co-curricular leadership and career development opportunities based on classroom instruction.
Effective programs employ FHA-HERO as a teaching strategy for developing interpersonal, leadership, citizenship, and career skills.
Overview of Home Economics Careers and Technology Programs
3
Chart 1.1 Home Economics Careers and Technology CFS · HERO · FHA-HERO*
Relationship of Content Areas to Career Pathways This listing shows the correlation of the Consumer and Family Studies content areas to the Home Economics Related Occupations career pathways.
Consumer and Family Studies (Content Areas) Home Economics Related Occupations (Career Pathways)
Child Development and Guidance Consumer Education Family Living and Parenting Education Fashion, Textiles, and Apparel Food and Nutrition**
Child Development and Education Consumer Services Family and Human Services Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition Food Service and Hospitality Hospitality, Tourism, and Recreation
Housing and Furnishings Individual and Family Health**
Interior Design, Furnishings, and Maintenance
* FHA-HERO leadership and career development are integral to the instructional program for grades six through twelve.
** This content area may be offered as a part of several career pathways.
Organization and Characteristics of the Content Standards Home Economics Careers and Technology standards are organized into nine sections.
The first section identifies content standards for the seven Consumer and Family Studies content areas and for transferable and employability skills.
The eight sections that follow address the Home Economics Related Occupations capstone courses that complete the career pathways.
A brief description of the curricular focus and format of the standards introduces each section.
Standards for both CFS and HERO programs contain the following components: Title of the standard: The title of each standard identifies the concept addressed in the content.
Statement of the standard: Each standard addresses broadly what a student should know.
Benchmarks: Statements listed below each standard describe what students should be able to do to meet the broad standard.
4
Overview of Home Economics Careers and Technology Programs
The HECT content standards were developed by representatives from business, industry, the community, and all levels of education to ensure rigor, to reflect current practices and trends, and to address current and projected labor market needs.
Use of the Content Standards Content standards provide direction for curriculum decisions about instructional goals, objectives, content, teaching strategies, learning experiences, and assessment.
The standards serve as a guide for developing and revising curriculum to ensure that it is current and relevant.
In addition, these standards serve as a tool for collaborating with instructors in other disciplines to design interdisciplinary projects that reflect the content of the standards for each of the disciplines that are involved.
Standards also guide the content of new courses and course sequences to avoid unnecessary duplication in the various levels of education.
They also may direct decisions about appropriate professional development activities designed to upgrade the skills and knowledge of current instructors and to prepare future instructors to become effective educators.
(See the appendix, "Overview of HECT Course Sequences, Grades Nine Through Twelve," for information about developing career pathway course sequences.)
Content standards form the foundation for assessing student achievement.
They identify the content to be assessed and suggest strategies for assessing student achievement.
Classroom-based assessment, such as tests, demonstrations, portfolios, and projects, should address the skills, attitudes, and behaviors defined in the standards.
These content standards will also be used in the development of statewide examinations for selected HECT programs through the Assessments in Career Education (ACE) program.
Students who achieve a high rating on this examination will receive a seal on their high school diplomas and transcripts to indicate outstanding achievement.
By basing curriculum and assessment on content standards that reflect current programs and all aspects of an industry, students will be effectively prepared with knowledge, skills, and behaviors to enter postsecondary education and a career related to Home Economics Careers and Technology and progress to technical-level or professional-level positions.
Technical assistance and resources for implementing standards-based course sequences and programs for Home Economics Careers and Technology education are available from the Home Economics Careers and Technology Unit, Standards and High School Development Division, California Department of Education.
Consumer and Family Studies
Part I
6
Over view of Consumer and Family Studies Programs
The Consumer and Family Studies (CFS) program in grades nine through twelve teaches skills for balancing personal, family, and work responsibilities and provides the foundation for entering Home Economics Related Occupations (HERO) programs or advanced education in related fields.
Students gain life management skills through leadership and career development and instruction in seven content areas: child development and guidance; consumer education; family living and parenting education; fashion, textiles, and apparel; food and nutrition; housing and furnishings; and individual and family health.
The highlighted portions of Chart 2.1, "Home Economics Careers and Technology Education Career Pathway Options," illustrate the consumer and family studies courses that may be included in HECT career pathways.
The CFS portion of a career pathway course sequence includes both the comprehensive core and specialized content area courses.
The CFS Comprehensive Core courses (Life Management I and II) provide an introduction to HECT and serve as a foundation for all the HECT career pathways.
The Comprehensive Core provides instruction in all seven content areas.
At minimum, a one-year introductory Comprehensive Core course (Life Management I) should be taught during grades nine or ten to build foundation skills for career pathway instruction.
The second yearlong advanced Comprehensive Core course (Life Management II) enables students to acquire an in-depth knowledge in each of the content areas.
The two courses combine to contribute the background necessary for students to master the identified standards in all seven content areas.
Specialized content area courses address only one CFS content area, expanding the knowledge, skills, and attitudes learned in the Comprehensive
Chart 2.1
Home Economics Careers and Technology Education Career Pathway Options Home Economics Related Occupations (HERO) Grades 11 and 12 HERO: District- or ROCP-Funded Programs Introduction to Teaching Careers (Optional) Careers in Education Careers in Child Development
Consumer and Family Studies (CFS) Grades 10, 11, and 12 CFS Specialized Courses
Grades 6­10 CFS Foundation Courses Child Development and Guidance Grades 9 and 10 CFS Core Courses
Consumer Education Life Management I* Economics for Living
Careers in Consumer Services
Community College Careers in Family and Human Services Four-Year College or University
Middle Grades Exploratory CFS Courses
Family Living and Parenting Education Life Management II* Fashion, Textiles, and Apparel Introduction to Fashion Careers (Optional)
Exploratory Home Economics Careers and Technology (Grades 6 and 7)
Careers in Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising Employment
Teen Living (Grade 8) Grades 10, 11, and 12 CFS Specialized Course
Nutritional Science
Careers in Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition Apprenticeship Careers in Food Service and Hospitality
Parenting and Personal Relationships (Grades 7 and 8)
Individual and Family Health** Food and Nutrition *Focuses on managing work and family.
These courses are recommended for all career pathways.
**May be offered as part of several career pathways.
Introduction to Hospitality Careers (Optional) Careers in Hospitality, Tourism, and Recreation
Private Postsecondary Programs/Training
Housing and Furnishings Environmental Design
FHA-HERO leadership and career development are integral to the instructional program for grades 6­12.
Careers in Interior Design, Furnishings, and Maintenance
7
8
Consumer and Family Studies
Core.
For example, a nutritional science course augments learning in the food and nutrition unit of a Comprehensive Core course.
These courses enable students to gain depth in a content area of interest to them and enhance their preparation for entry into a HERO career pathway capstone program and a related postsecondary certificate or degree program in a school district or regional occupational center program (ROCP).
Effective programs incorporate FHA-HERO as a teaching strategy for developing interpersonal, leadership, citizenship, and career skills.
FHAHERO, the pre-professional organization for students, provides co-curricular leadership and career development opportunities that address content standards in all CFS instructional programs.
Organization and Characteristics of the Consumer and Family Studies Content Standards Representatives of the community and instructors of secondary and postsecondary education programs developed CFS standards for the seven content areas and for the transferable and employability skills.
Transferable skills, such as thinking and problem solving, are applied in all careers and personal life.
Employability skills support successful career entry and advancement in all careers.
Balancing personal, family, and work responsibilities and FHA-HERO leadership development activities is integral to the standards.
The content areas, along with the transferable and employability standards, are formatted into eight sections.
Each content area section contains standards for both the Comprehensive Core and specialized content area courses.
The transferable and employability skills standards are to be applied to and integrated with instruction of the content area standards.
They are to be assessed in conjunction with the content area standards, not in isolation.
Each standard contains the following components: Title of the standard: The title of each standard identifies the concept addressed in the content.
Statement of the standard: Each standard addresses broadly what a student should know.
Benchmarks: Statements listed below each standard describe what students should be able to do to meet the broad standard.
Benchmarks consist of two categories of statements: those that must be taught in the CFS Comprehensive Core courses and those that should be taught in specialized content courses.
Consumer and Family Studies
9
The reader should note that statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
Use of the Consumer and Family Studies Content Standards The content standards are intended for use by high school CFS instructors and administrators to plan and establish new programs or to strengthen and expand existing programs.
They provide the foundation for curriculum, instruction, and assessment.
See also the section "Use of the Content Standards," described in "Overview of Home Economics Careers and Technology Programs" at the beginning of this document.
CFS instructors and administrators will also use these standards in collaborating with instructors in the middle grades and in HERO and postsecondary education programs to articulate and sequence instruction, thereby eliminating unnecessary duplication of content in the various levels of education.
Implementing these standards at the secondary grade level will prepare students with the higher-level skills needed to enter HERO capstone or postsecondary education programs.
The appendix, "Overview of HECT Course Sequences, Grades Nine Through Twelve," contains more information about designing course sequences.
Individuals who can balance work, personal, and family responsibilities are more productive workers and can better manage all aspects of their lives.
Technical assistance and resources for implementing standards-based HECT career pathway course sequences and programs are available from the Home Economics Careers and Technology Unit, Standards and High School Development Division, California Department of Education.
10
Child Development and Guidance Content Area Standards Listed below are the child development and guidance content area standards.
Standard 1 Responsible Parenting Students will understand the decisions and responsibilities of parents.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 1.1 1.2 1.3 1.4 Identifying parenting responsibilities; Describing parenting skills that meet physical, emotional, social, and intellectual needs of the child; Analyzing the major decisions and responsibilities of being a parent; and Evaluating caregiving options.
Standard 2 Studying and Understanding Children Students will understand the importance of studying the development of children and methods used in child development research.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 2.1 2.2 2.3 2.4 Explaining the benefits of studying child development; Using observation techniques to study children's behavior and interpret findings; Reviewing the history of the study of child development; and Identifying research methods used to collect data on children.
Standard 3 Prenatal Development Students will understand the stages of pregnancy from conception through birth and the implications of the effects of the environment and heredity on the health and well-being of the child.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 3.1 3.2 3.3 3.4 Summarizing the stages of prenatal development; Analyzing the effects of prospective parents' nutrition, health, medical care, environment, and lifestyle on prenatal development; Explaining factors related to at-risk pregnancies; Analyzing how individuals are genetically unique;
Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
Child Development and Guidance Content Area Standards
11
3.5 3.6 3.7 3.8
Contrasting the effects of heredity and environment on prenatal development; Examining the costs, ethics, and risks of such medical procedures as in vitro fertilization, amniocentesis, and prenatal surgery; Describing and comparing the various methods of childbirth; and Compiling a list of and evaluating community resources that provide information and assistance with prenatal care and family planning.
Standard 4 Child Growth and Development Students will understand the stages of child growth and development from infancy through adolescence and the value of providing children with developmentally appropriate activities.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 4.1 4.2 4.3 4.4 4.5 Identifying and comparing the commonly accepted areas and principles of child development; Analyzing the stages of growth and development and selecting developmentally appropriate activities; Analyzing the effects of heredity and environment on the physical, social, emotional, and intellectual development of children; Listing factors that contribute to optimal development of children; and Comparing various theories regarding human growth and development.
Standard 5 Guidance and Discipline Students will understand the positive guidance and discipline techniques that promote feelings of self-worth as they apply to the developmental stages of children.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 5.1 5.2 5.3 5.4 5.5 5.6 Defining self-worth; Describing the relationship of a child's behavior to the commonly accepted principles of child growth and development; Describing and comparing various approaches to child guidance and their effect on self-worth; Analyzing techniques used to provide positive reinforcement with children in given situations and at various stages of development; Describing communication techniques and assessing the effects of their use with the child; Analyzing the relationship of guidance to the development of selfdiscipline;
Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
12
Child Development and Guidance Content Area Standards
5.7 5.8
Analyzing case studies that describe inappropriate behavior to determine possible causes and suggest solutions; and Assessing the effectiveness of various guidance strategies in promoting self-worth and self-discipline in children.
Standard 6 Child Abuse and Neglect Students will understand the factors that contribute to child abuse and neglect and the importance of helping abused and neglected children.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 6.1 6.2 6.3 6.4 6.5 Describing factors that contribute to child abuse and neglect; Identifying characteristics of the abused and the abuser; Identifying agencies and programs that provide services for abused and neglected children; Demonstrating knowledge of child abuse laws and reporting procedures; and Investigating possible causes of abusive behavior and strategies that help in reducing child abuse and neglect.
Standard 7 Health and Safety Students will understand the factors and practices that promote the health and safety of children.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 7.1 7.2 7.3 7.4 7.5 7.6 7.7 7.8 7.9 Describing methods for maintaining the health and ensuring the safety of children; Identifying common childhood illnesses and accidents; Proposing practices and precautions that can be taken to prevent childhood illnesses and accidents; Describing the relationship of a nutritionally balanced diet to optimum health; Analyzing and applying sanitation practices to maintain the health of a child; Investigating and selecting community agencies and resources that provide child health care services and information; Using appropriate first-aid procedures for children; Investigating and reporting on public laws that deal with the health and safety of children; Evaluating a child's environment for health and safety factors and making recommendations for improvement;
Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
Child Development and Guidance Content Area Standards
13
7.10 Developing plans for emergencies and disasters; and 7.11 Planning a nutritionally balanced diet that is appropriate for a child.
Standard 8 Learning, Play, and Recreation Students will understand the value and methods of providing infants, children, and adolescents with learning, play, and recreational activities.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 8.1 Identifying and describing the purposes of play, learning, and recreational activities to the physical, social, emotional, and intellectual development of children and adolescents; Identifying factors to consider when selecting and purchasing play, learning, and recreational materials; Choosing or creating materials that are appropriate for the developmental levels of children; Evaluating facilities, equipment, and materials that contribute to a child's development, such as toys, stories, games, play spaces, and materials, including computers and computer applications; Describing the caregiver's role in learning, recreational, and play activities; Describing the relationship of learning, play, and recreational activities to the commonly accepted principles of the development of children and adolescents; Analyzing how the attainment of self-help skills such as hygiene, dressing, food preparation, and household chores contributes to a child's learning and self-concept; Describing the relationship between the developmental level of children and the development of creativity; Planning, conducting, and evaluating activities for creative development, such as art, music, and movement and dramatic play, suitable for children at various stages of development; and
8.2 8.3 8.4
8.5 8.6
8.7
8.8 8.9
8.10 Planning, conducting, and evaluating various learning, play, and recreational activities that enhance the physical development of children and adolescents.
Standard 9 Cultural Diversity Students will understand the child-rearing traditions and customs of various cultures as those practices relate to children's behavior and learning and Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
14
Child Development and Guidance Content Area Standards
the importance of considering children's backgrounds when interacting with families and children.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 9.1 9.2 9.3 9.4 Recognizing the roles and responsibilities of family members from various cultures; Identifying the influence of culture on a child's behavior and learning; Recommending appropriate strategies for providing for the needs of children from various cultures; and Selecting bias-free materials and activities.
Standard 10 Children with Special Needs Students will understand the contributions and considerations for the care of children with special needs, including children with physical and learning disabilities and gifted children, and ways in which those children's needs can be met to enhance self-concept and self-worth.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 10.1 Defining the term children with special needs; 10.2 Identifying characteristics of children with special needs; 10.3 Discussing the importance of early identification of children with special needs; 10.4 Describing and analyzing strategies for helping children with special needs; 10.5 Identifying agencies and programs that provide services for children with special needs; and 10.6 Investigating equipment, techniques, and practices for helping children with special needs.
Standard 11 Changes That Affect Children Students will understand how change affects infants, children, and adolescents and the importance of providing appropriate methods for adapting to change.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 11.1 Identifying factors contributing to change in the lives of children and adolescents and ways in which they might respond to change; 11.2 Analyzing how changes and crises affect infants, children, and adolescents; 11.3 Explaining how various role models influence children's and adolescents' ability to cope; Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
Child Development and Guidance Content Area Standards
15
11.4 Recommending appropriate strategies and resources that help children and adolescents in adapting to changes and crises; and 11.5 Explaining how changes in technology have an impact on children and adolescents and describing methods for helping them to adapt to those changes.
Standard 12 Careers Related to Child Development and Education Students will understand careers related to child development and education.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 12.1 Identifying characteristics of effective child development and education professionals; 12.2 Comparing personal interests, aptitudes, and abilities with those required in child development and education careers; 12.3 Evaluating career options related to child development and education, including labor market projections, educational requirements, job responsibilities, salary, benefits, employers' expectations, and working environment; and 12.4 Developing a career plan in child development and education that reflects upward career mobility and opportunities for entrepreneurship.
Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
16
Consumer Education Content Area Standards Listed below are the content area standards for consumer education.
Standard 1
Consumer Economics Students will understand the interrelationship of individuals and families and the national economy.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 1.1 1.2 Describing how consumers are influenced by mass media, society, and cultural and economic backgrounds; and Examining ways in which individual and family consumer decisions affect and are affected by the national economy.
Standard 2
Consumer Decisions Students will understand the process for making consumer decisions through the use of decision-making models.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 2.1 2.2 2.3 2.4 2.5 2.6 Defining values, goals, needs, and wants; Defining and applying personal values, long- and short-term goals, needs, and wants as they relate to consumer decisions; Identifying the steps of a decision-making model and applying the process to a variety of consumer situations; Describing how personal values, goals, and choices are influenced by mass media, society, and cultural and economic backgrounds; Describing how personal values, goals, and choices are influenced by self-concept, family members, and peers; and Identifying ways to use personal, family, and community resources to extend opportunities for achieving goals.
Standard 3
Consumer Purchases Students will understand how to compare and evaluate goods and services.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 3.1 3.2 Evaluating sources of information about goods and services to determine their reliability; Identifying, comparing, and evaluating retail or wholesale sources or both for consumer goods and services;
Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
Consumer Education Content Area Standards
17
3.3 3.4 3.5
Evaluating warranties, guarantees, and labels for consumer purchases; Differentiating between reliable and deceptive advertising terminology and sales techniques; and Listing factors that affect the availability, quality, and cost of products.
Standard 4
Financial Management Students will understand how to manage financial resources to achieve goals.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 4.1 4.2 4.3 4.4 4.5 4.6 4.7 4.8 4.9 Defining financial management terms; Developing a budget for an individual or family based on estimated income, needs, wants, goals, and lifestyle; Comparing guidelines that individuals and families can use in applying for and using credit; Interpreting a wage statement and applying the information to develop a budget for an individual or a family; Examining changing patterns of resources, spending, and savings during the family life cycle; Evaluating different types of systems for keeping individual and family records; Evaluating information about available financial services; Relating the effective use of loans to the ability to achieve personal and career goals; Comparing advantages and disadvantages of various methods of computing interest;
4.10 Computing the dollar cost of credit and comparing various sources of credit; 4.11 Determining a plan to achieve specific individual and family financial goals, using financial services as appropriate; 4.12 Examining investment plans to meet individual and family goals at various stages of the life cycle; 4.13 Identifying and evaluating individual and family insurance needs throughout the different stages of the life cycle; 4.14 Completing an income tax return form; and 4.15 Analyzing the impact of technology on financial management.
Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
18
Consumer Education Content Area Standards
Standard 5
Consumer Rights and Responsibilities Students will understand consumer resources, rights, and responsibilities.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 5.1 5.2 5.3 5.4 5.5 5.6 5.7 5.8 5.9 Analyzing acceptable and ethical consumer practices and behaviors; Identifying consumer protection laws, agencies, services, and procedures for solving consumer problems; Explaining consumer rights and responsibilities; Assessing the effect of consumer choices and behavior on small and large business owners, other consumers, and the environment; Analyzing laws and regulations that protect the consumer; Assessing legal responsibilities and obligations when a credit contract has been signed; Examining ways in which consumer advocates and volunteer groups affect consumer choices and laws; Examining the impact of laws that regulate advertising; Exploring appropriate procedures, including the use of redress, to solve consumer problems; and
5.10 Listing examples of consumer laws that regulate individual, corporate, and business practices and behavior.
Standard 6
Role of Government Students will understand the role of government in the economy at the local, state, and national levels.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 6.1 6.2 6.3 6.4 6.5 Identifying the purposes for which taxes are collected at the local, state, and federal levels; Analyzing the consequences of consumer legislation on consumers and the economy; Describing the impact of fiscal and monetary policy on individuals, families, and the community; Assessing key indicators of economic performance through the use of charts, graphs, and other tools of analysis; and Analyzing government regulations and ways in which they affect local, state, and national economies.
Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
Consumer Education Content Area Standards
19
Standard 7
Marketplace Functions Students will understand the functions of the marketplace.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 7.1 7.2 7.3 7.4 7.5 Describing ways in which competition affects the quantities and prices of goods and services available to consumers; Analyzing economic relationships that exist between households and businesses in a market economy; Identifying factors that determine supply and demand; Analyzing the effects of increases and decreases in supply and demand on price and quantity; Recognizing the characteristics of competitive and noncompetitive market structures and assessing their impact on consumer choices; and Comparing the effects of inflation, recession, and unemployment on businesses, individuals, families, and communities.
7.6
Standard 8
Economic Concepts Students will understand the basic economic concepts that affect consumers.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 8.1 8.2 Defining the basic concepts and components of the U.S. economic system; Relating the basic concepts and components of the U.S. economic system to the student's role within the economy, including the circular flow of the market economy; Defining economic terms, such as scarcity, opportunity cost, tradeoffs, and resource allocation; and Explaining the relationships of scarcity, choice, and opportunity costs.
8.3 8.4
Standard 9
Economic Systems Students will understand different economic systems.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 9.1 9.2 9.3 Comparing market, command, mixed, and traditional economies; Recognizing the characteristics of different economic systems and assessing their impact on consumer choices; Determining the advantages and disadvantages of bartering and negotiating to achieve goals;
Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
20
Consumer Education Content Area Standards
9.4
Analyzing personal beliefs regarding the role of government regulation and the effect of regulations and policies on broad social goals; and Analyzing the role of the Federal Reserve System and its effects on the consumer.
9.5
Standard 10 Global Economy Students will understand the concept of a global economy.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 10.1 Defining the economic concepts of absolute and comparative advantage; 10.2 Comparing work patterns in the U.S. with those in other countries; 10.3 Analyzing the relationships of specialization of labor and economic interdependency; 10.4 Debating the impact of free trade and protectionism and its effect on the consumer; 10.5 Identifying how international trade and immigration affect the U.S. economy and the cost of various goods and services; 10.6 Determining the value of the dollar based on foreign exchange rates; and 10.7 Explaining how current technological changes affect the global economy.
Standard 11 Careers Related to Consumer Services Students will understand careers related to consumer services.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 11.1 Identifying characteristics of effective consumer services professionals; 11.2 Comparing personal interests, aptitudes, and abilities with those required in consumer services careers; 11.3 Evaluating career options related to consumer services, including labor market projections, educational requirements, job responsibilities, salary, benefits, employers' expectations, and working environment; and 11.4 Developing a career plan in consumer services that reflects upward career mobility and opportunities for entrepreneurship.
Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
21
Family Living and Parenting Education Content Area Standards Listed below are the content area standards for family living and parenting education.
Standard 1
Family and Society Students will understand the function of the family as a basic unit of society.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 1.1 1.2 1.3 1.4 1.5 1.6 Describing the function of the family and the socioeconomic and cultural influences; Identifying the differences in family structures; Analyzing the meaning of family and the value of families to individuals and society; Comparing the families of past generations with contemporary families; Analyzing how economic and societal changes influence family and work roles and responsibilities; and Describing the future impact of technology on families and relationships.
Standard 2
Contributions of the Family Students will understand the contributions of the family to the development of individuals.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 2.1 2.2 2.3 2.4 2.5 Explaining the function of the family in providing a nurturing environment for its members; Describing various roles and responsibilities assumed by family members during each stage of the life cycle; Describing ways for family members to become involved in family functions and responsibilities; Describing causes and effects of stereotyping in the development of and changes in family roles; Examining traditional and nontraditional roles and responsibilities of family members;
Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
22
Family Living and Parenting Education Content Area Standards
2.6 2.7 2.8 2.9
Explaining the contributions of the aged to the family unit and to society; Explaining ways in which families influence individual self-esteem, personality development, values, and relationships; Explaining the implications and consequences when family members do not fulfill their responsibilities; and Describing the importance of personal and family involvement in the community and ways for individuals to provide community service.
Standard 3
Personal Development Students will understand the factors that affect the development of selfconcept, values, character, personality, and philosophy of life.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 3.1 3.2 3.3 Identifying personal values and goals and describing the role of values in making decisions and achieving goals; Comparing, prioritizing, and setting short-term and long-term goals; and Describing the factors that contribute to the development of character and personality.
Standard 4
Positive Relationships Students will understand that positive relationships are built on feelings of self-worth, effective communication, common values and goals, and responsible behavior.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 4.1 4.2 4.3 4.4 Analyzing the characteristics and behaviors that contribute to developing positive relationships; Analyzing the positive qualities of their relationships, including those with family, friends, teachers, and employers; Explaining communication strategies that can resolve conflicts and build successful relationships; Describing and applying effective verbal and nonverbal communication skills that build positive relationships, enhance self-esteem, and increase respect for others; Describing common values and goals that promote positive, lasting relationships; and Illustrating how relationships are important in helping people cope with their changing world and life events.
4.5 4.6
Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
Family Living and Parenting Education Content Area Standards
23
Standard 5
Dating Relationships and Commitments Students will understand dating relationships, love, and commitment.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 5.1 5.2 5.3 5.4 5.5 5.6 5.7 Identifying the purpose of dating and the qualities of a dating partner; Analyzing the problems involved in dating; Assessing personal qualities that lead to the selection of a suitable partner or mate and love and commitment to the relationship; Examining family, legal, societal, and cultural factors that influence the selection of a mate; Analyzing the importance of abstinence in dating relationships; Describing responsible and irresponsible behaviors and the consequences of each; and Analyzing the influence of the media in shaping sexual attitudes and behavior.
Standard 6
Marriage and Family Life Students will understand the components of marriage and family life.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 6.1 6.2 6.3 6.4 6.5 6.6 Analyzing expectations of marriage and family life and the factors that contribute to effective relationships; Comparing the advantages and disadvantages of single life, marriage, and parenthood; Comparing traditional marriage with other forms of cohabitation and lifestyles; Analyzing the meaning and responsibilities of commitment to one person in marriage or in long-term relationships; Explaining the areas of adjustment for a successful marriage or longterm commitment; and Analyzing the difference between physical and psychological intimacy.
Standard 7
Parenting Skills Students will understand skills necessary for parenting and child guidance.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 7.1 Describing the responsibilities of being a parent;
Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
24
Family Living and Parenting Education Content Area Standards
7.2 7.3
Evaluating different styles and strategies of parenting; and Explaining the role of the parent in the physical, emotional, social, and intellectual development of the child.
Standard 8
Major Life Changes Students will understand the adjustments needed to adapt to major life changes throughout the life cycle.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 8.1 8.2 8.3 8.4 8.5 8.6 8.7 Describing common major life changes, issues, and adjustments that individuals encounter during the life cycle; Summarizing adjustments required as family structures change; Analyzing the factors that help facilitate life adjustments; Applying the decision-making process to meet the demands of different family structures; Analyzing the effects of unemployment, career change, retraining, incarceration, and retirement; Describing the adjustments needed by two-career families; Describing the changes that occur in the aging process, the special needs of the aged, and the ways in which those needs may be met by family members and community agencies; Examining skills that are needed by individuals who care for family members with special emotional, physical, social, and economic needs; and Explaining current laws and court decisions relating to marriage, parenthood, death, and dissolution of marriage.
8.8
8.9
Standard 9
Conflicts and Crises Students will understand strategies and resources for managing conflicts and crises.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 9.1 9.2 9.3 9.4 Identifying sources and the effects of conflicts and crises in a variety of work, personal, and family situations; Assessing personal attributes and available resources for coping with conflicts and crises; Applying strategies for coping with personal, social, and workrelated conflicts and crises; Explaining the effects of positive and negative stress factors on psychological and physiological well-being; and
Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
Family Living and Parenting Education Content Area Standards
25
9.5
Explaining the services of local public and private agencies available to help individuals and families.
Standard 10 Careers Related to Family and Human Services Students will understand careers related to family and human services.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 10.1 Identifying the characteristics of effective family and human services professionals; 10.2 Comparing personal interests, aptitudes, and abilities with those required in family and human services careers; 10.3 Evaluating career options related to family and human services, including labor market projections, educational requirements, job responsibilities, salary, benefits, employers' expectations, and working environment; and 10.4 Developing a career plan in family and human services that reflects upward career mobility and opportunities for entrepreneurship.
Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
26
Fashion, Textiles, and Apparel Content Area Standards
Listed below are the content area standards for fashion, textiles, and apparel.
Standard 1
Apparel and Behavior Students will understand how fashion, textiles, and apparel meet social, physical, and psychological needs of individuals and family members.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 1.1 1.2 1.3 1.4 Differentiating between appropriate and inappropriate dress for a variety of situations; Explaining how fashion, textiles, and apparel selection meet social, physical, and psychological needs; Analyzing how fads and fashion influence fashion and textile choices; and Explaining how cultural values and ideals are expressed through fashion, textiles, and apparel.
Standard 2
Elements and Principles of Design Students will understand the elements and principles of design as they apply to apparel.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 2.1 2.2 2.3 2.4 2.5 2.6 Explaining and applying fundamental concepts of the elements and principles of design to fashion, textiles, and apparel; Applying elements and principles of design to enhance various body types; Explaining how the selection and placement of accessories influence appearance; Explaining how the elements and principles of design are used to select accessories; Combining complementary apparel and accessory items to achieve a desired image; and Relating the elements and principles of design to costumes and textile designs.
Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
Fashion, Textiles, and Apparel Content Area Standards
27
Standard 3
Color Theory Students will understand the theory and use of color in fashion, textiles, and apparel.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 3.1 3.2 3.3 3.4 3.5 Identifying color terminology and color schemes; Creating a color wheel and various examples of color schemes; Selecting apparel colors to flatter various skin undertones; Creating a value chart, including tints and shades; and Selecting colors for apparel and accessories to complement the individual.
Standard 4
Wardrobe Planning and Budgeting Students will understand the principles of wardrobe planning and the factors influencing apparel budgets for individuals and families.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 4.1 4.2 4.3 Selecting fashion, textile, and apparel products that are appropriate for a variety of situations; Planning and selecting apparel that is complementary to an individual's body type, coloring, and personality; Creating a plan for fashion and apparel purchases for a hypothetical individual or family and justifying purchases on the basis of such factors as cost, family activities, coordination, and care; Evaluating apparel choices according to an individual's goals; Conducting an inventory of a current wardrobe and projecting and developing a plan to meet future needs; Analyzing a family's clothing needs and wants during various stages of the family life cycle; Developing a plan for extending and expanding a wardrobe; Illustrating methods for extending an apparel budget through effective planning and shopping techniques; Investigating ways to expand the apparel budget by recycling or resale of wardrobe and household items;
4.4 4.5 4.6 4.7 4.8 4.9
4.10 Evaluating the influence of workplace requirements for wardrobes; and 4.11 Developing an apparel budget appropriate for the needs of an individual or a family.
Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
28
Fashion, Textiles, and Apparel Content Area Standards
Standard 5
History of Fashion Students will understand the historical development of modern dress.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 5.1 5.2 5.3 5.4 5.5 Investigating the influence of historic clothing on current fashions and fads; Analyzing the cultural and historic development of fashions, textiles, and apparel; Researching the contributions of specific cultures to fashion and design; Designing a garment or textile product that reflects a specific cultural group or time period; and Describing the changes in fashion brought about by technological advances.
Standard 6
Apparel Analysis Students will understand differences in quality and sources of manufactured and custom apparel.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 6.1 6.2 6.3 6.4 6.5 Evaluating and comparing the quality of manufactured and custom apparel; Comparing similar garments at various retail sources for cost and quality; Evaluating the pros and cons of self-constructed and purchased apparel and textile items in terms of time, energy, and costs; Compiling a directory of retail outlets for various markets, including television and computer sources; and Comparing services offered by different sources of apparel.
Standard 7
Apparel for Individuals with Special Needs Students will understand the factors influencing apparel for individuals with special needs.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 7.1 7.2 Identifying sources that provide or sell fashions, textiles, or apparel to people with special needs; Analyzing the information provided by public and private agencies regarding fashions, textiles, and apparel for individuals with special needs;
Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
Fashion, Textiles, and Apparel Content Area Standards
29
7.3 7.4 7.5
Selecting fiber and fabric construction methods that are best suited to individuals with special needs; Modifying and designing garments for individuals with special needs; and Identifying notions, such as closures and accessories, appropriate for constructing apparel for individuals with special needs.
Standard 8
Textiles Students will understand the characteristics of different textile fibers, fabrics, and finishes.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 8.1 8.2 8.3 8.4 8.5 8.6 8.7 8.8 Describing the influence of fabric care on textile selection; Distinguishing between natural and manufactured fibers; Describing the characteristics of woven, nonwoven, and knitted processes; Selecting appropriate products and techniques to remove stains from clothing and textiles; Examining the chemical and physical properties of fibers and fabrics; Applying knowledge of textiles and regulations for apparel to decisions about apparel; Selecting textiles with appropriate finishes for the intended textile use; Describing the effects of various methods of caring for apparel and household textiles and the impact on energy and conservation of resources; and Evaluating and selecting a variety of procedures and products designed to care for apparel and textiles.
8.9
Standard 9
Creating Custom Apparel Students will understand basic apparel construction.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 9.1 9.2 9.3 9.4 Selecting appropriate materials, tools, and equipment for maintenance and construction of apparel; Measuring the body accurately; Constructing apparel and household textile items through the use of appropriate custom construction techniques and equipment; Evaluating basic techniques used in sewing, such as constructing seams and hems and adding zippers and fasteners.
Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
30
Fashion, Textiles, and Apparel Content Area Standards
9.5 9.6
Selecting fabrics appropriate for apparel items; Developing advanced custom construction skills through the use of unusual fabrics, techniques for fit and alterations, and complex patterns; Using computers in selecting, planning, and designing projects; Assessing factors to consider in purchasing equipment for home or commercial use; Analyzing the use of appropriate finishing techniques for garments constructed either by custom or by manufactured methods; and
9.7 9.8 9.9
9.10 Using advanced-level apparel construction skills, such as altering, redesigning, and reweaving.
Standard 10 Remodeling and Recycling Clothing Students will understand how to remodel and recycle clothing.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 10.1 Estimating the cost of remodeling and recycling garments; 10.2 Identifying current fashions that would be appropriate for recycling and remodeling garments; and 10.3 Determining ways in which old clothing or household textiles or both can be repaired, recycled, or restored.
Standard 11 Garment Alteration Students will understand how to alter a garment.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 11.1 Identifying and evaluating resources and services available for altering and repairing clothing; 11.2 Evaluating the appropriateness of altering an apparel item; 11.3 Using techniques for marking garments for alterations; 11.4 Recommending necessary alterations; 11.5 Performing quality alterations; and 11.6 Evaluating the fit of an altered apparel item.
Standard 12 Careers Related to Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising Students will understand careers related to fashion design, manufacturing, and merchandising.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
Fashion, Textiles, and Apparel Content Area Standards
31
12.1 Identifying characteristics of effective fashion design, manufacturing, and merchandising professionals; 12.2 Comparing personal interests, aptitudes, and abilities with those required in fashion design, manufacturing, and merchandising careers; 12.3 Evaluating career options related to fashion, design, manufacturing, and merchandising, including labor market projections, educational requirements, job responsibilities, salary, benefits, employers' expectations, and working environment; and 12.4 Developing a career plan in fashion, textiles, and apparel that reflects upward career mobility and opportunities for entrepreneurship.
Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
32
Food and Nutrition Content Area Standards Listed below are the content area standards for food and nutrition.
Standard 1
Nutrition and Health Students will understand the application of the principles of nutrition and their relationship to good health throughout the life cycle.
They will demonstrate proficiency by: 1.1 1.2 1.3 1.4 1.5 1.6 1.7 1.8 Defining the relationship between nutrition and good health; Explaining and comparing the food categories and recommended servings in the Food Guide Pyramid with those in their daily diet; Identifying the major nutrients and explaining their functions and sources; Comparing and analyzing label information on food products; Describing food-related illnesses, including anorexia, bulimia, obesity, and malnutrition; Explaining the process of digestion, absorption, and metabolism in the body's use of food; Defining the criteria for the evaluation of nutritional information and categorizing them into valid and nonvalid sources; Evaluating nutritional needs that occur during various stages of the life cycle and designing a diet to meet the changing nutritional needs of individuals in different stages of the life cycle; Examining the relationship of lifestyle, occupation, gender, age, body structure, stress, and other factors to nutritional needs, food choices, and habits;
1.9
1.10 Analyzing the effects of poor nutrition and substance abuse on prenatal, child, teen, and adult development and health; 1.11 Reviewing and reporting on current research that examines the effects of food additives, salt, sugar, fats, and complex carbohydrates; 1.12 Defining current nutritional terminology, such as natural, organic, reduced fat, and enriched; 1.13 Comparing and evaluating dietary programs and information that deal with weight control and nutrition; 1.14 Evaluating the influence of the media on nutrition and physical fitness; and Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
Food and Nutrition Content Area Standards
33
1.15 Identifying and describing the services of public and private agencies that provide food and nutrition information and protection to consumers at the local, state, and national levels.
Standard 2 Food Safety and Sanitation Students will understand the principles of maintaining food safety and sanitation.
They will demonstrate proficiency by: 2.1 2.2 2.3 2.4 2.5 2.6 2.7 Identifying organisms that cause food spoilage, sources of contamination, and conditions required for the growth of organisms; Identifying common types of food-borne illnesses; Employing sanitary practices before, during, and after food preparation and service; Selecting proper techniques for storage and preparation of food; Describing the agencies that determine food safety regulations; Comparing the responsibilities of various governmental agencies concerned with food safety and nutrition; and Analyzing messages about food safety issues that consumers receive from the media.
Standard 3 Facilities and Equipment The student will understand the selection, use, and care of safe and efficient facilities and equipment.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 3.1 3.2 3.3 3.4 Identifying and minimizing safety hazards in the kitchen; Identifying and selecting steps to be followed during emergencies related to accidents with food and equipment; Listing special precautions to ensure safe kitchen environments for children and individuals with special needs; Analyzing a variety of surfaces and materials used in kitchens and assessing their characteristics in terms of sanitation, safety, and maintenance; Designing a kitchen plan that incorporates the principles of safety and efficiency, including the work triangle concept; Describing food preparation equipment and appliances in terms of needs, want, cost, safety, efficiency, use, and care; Applying appropriate practices when using, maintaining, and storing food preparation equipment and appliances;
3.5 3.6 3.7
Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
34
Food and Nutrition Content Area Standards
3.8 3.9
Comparing the characteristics of similar equipment in terms of time, cost, storage, size, maintenance, safety, and efficiency; Using a variety of appliances, equipment, and techniques to prepare food and meals; and
3.10 Developing a list of the most essential equipment and appliances for individuals and families on limited budgets and with limited food preparation facilities.
Standard 4
Meal Management Students will understand the principles of food purchasing and meal management.
They will demonstrate proficiency by: 4.1 4.2 4.3 4.4 4.5 4.6 4.7 Identifying ways to manage time, energy, and resources when planning and preparing meals; Using the management techniques for conserving time, energy, and resources when planning and preparing foods or meals; Using consumer skills to save money when selecting foods; Applying decision-making skills for purchasing food; Comparing information on food labels to compute unit cost, serving sizes, and amount needed; Planning meals that apply the principles of contrasts in flavors, colors, textures, and temperatures; Comparing the advantages and disadvantages of using commercially prepared and convenience food products with those of using homeprepared foods in terms of cost, quality, nutritional value, time, and energy; Developing a food budget for an individual or a family or both based on income, nutritional needs, and stages of the life cycle; Comparing information about fresh and processed food in terms of storage, safety, use, cost, and nutritional value;
4.8 4.9
4.10 Using consumer skills in selecting food that include comparing and selecting quality, unit prices, products, expiration dates, and brands; 4.11 Identifying and comparing local food source outlets for cost, convenience, services, and variety of selections; 4.12 Summarizing the advantages and disadvantages of preparing meals at home and dining out; 4.13 Comparing meals and computing meal costs for time, money, resources, nutritional quality, and satisfaction for various lifestyles and different stages of the life cycle; and Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
Food and Nutrition Content Area Standards
35
4.14 Analyzing food needs, methods of procurement, and storage space for hypothetical disasters and emergencies.
Standard 5
Food Preparation Students will understand the principles of food preparation.
They will demonstrate proficiency by: 5.1 5.2 5.3 5.4 5.5 5.6 5.7 5.8 5.9 Using appropriate equipment and techniques for dry and liquid measurements; Converting volume and weight measurements to increase and decrease yields of recipes; Interpreting a standardized recipe to prepare a food product; Defining food preparation terminology used in the preparation of a variety of food products; Describing the properties and functions of ingredients used to prepare foods; Applying food preparation techniques that preserve nutrients and enhance the flavor and appearance of food; Identifying food preparation techniques that can affect health; Defining and demonstrating food preparation techniques and skills; Analyzing time, energy, equipment, and use of resources in food preparation for individuals and families with various lifestyles or at different stages of the life cycle;
5.10 Applying basic concepts of food preparation and nutrition by planning, preparing, and serving aesthetically pleasing and nutritious meals; 5.11 Examining and applying psychology and aesthetics of food presentation; 5.12 Selecting appropriate food ingredients as substitutions in standardized recipes; and 5.13 Investigating and describing current trends in food preparation.
Standard 6
Meal Ser vice and Etiquette Students will understand styles of meal service and commonly accepted etiquette practices.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 6.1 6.2 Practicing basic table-setting techniques; Practicing table manners and etiquette as commonly accepted in the United States;
Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
36
Food and Nutrition Content Area Standards
6.3 6.4
Describing and practicing table settings for various occasions; and Describing and practicing a variety of meal service styles.
Standard 7
Food and Culture Students will understand that culture influences food choices and etiquette.
They will demonstrate proficiency by: 7.1 7.2 7.3 Identifying regional differences in the United States affecting the preparation and service of foods; Identifying cultural differences affecting the preparation and service of foods; Researching different cultures and comparing food preparation techniques, table settings, meal etiquette, and food habits and traditions commonly found in the United States; and Relating the influence of such factors as culture, geographic region, and socioeconomic status on food choices and habits.
7.4
Standard 8
The Science of Food and Nutrition Students will understand the principles of science related to food preparation and nutrition.
They will demonstrate proficiency by: 8.1 8.2 8.3 8.4 Defining nutrients and nutrient density; Applying the basic principles of science to food preparation; Analyzing and comparing the nutrient composition of a variety of foods and recipes; Relating the types and functions of proteins, carbohydrates, fats, vitamins, and minerals to dietary needs and associated health conditions throughout the life cycle; Describing the biochemical processes enabling the body to use nutrients from food; Describing the function of chemicals and additives in specific foods; Describing modifications in diet and physical activity to meet the nutritional needs of individuals in various age groups with different body types, activity levels, and health conditions; Explaining the effects of medications, alcohol, and drugs on the absorption and metabolism of nutrients; Applying data from nutritional research studies to evaluate information on nutrition and diet;
8.5 8.6 8.7
8.8 8.9
Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
Food and Nutrition Content Area Standards
37
8.10 Relating energy, acids, bases, and the states of matter to food and food sensory evaluation; and 8.11 Describing the physical and chemical processes that occur during food preparation and the effects of cooking methods and ingredient substitution on food products and their nutritional value.
Standard 9
Food Production and Technology Students will understand food production, processing, distribution methods, and the relationship of those techniques to the consumer food supply.
They will demonstrate proficiency by: 9.1 9.2 9.3 Describing technological advances that have affected food production, processing, and distribution; Evaluating the impact of current and emerging food technologies on food quality, availability, and cost; Analyzing health, safety, and environmental issues related to current and emerging food technologies, such as irradiation and genetic engineering; Describing quality assurance procedures used in food science or food processing companies or both; Comparing food production and processing techniques, safety standards, and distribution methods in the world marketplace; Investigating and describing the evolution and development of food products and preparation equipment; Describing and comparing different methods of preserving foods, including freezing, drying, canning, dehydrating, and using cold storage; and Explaining the methods used in the United States and other countries for retarding bacterial growth in food processing and distribution.
9.4 9.5 9.6 9.7
9.8
Standard 10 Careers Related to Food Service, Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition Students will understand careers related to food service, food science, dietetics, and nutrition.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 10.1 Identifying characteristics of effective food service, food science, dietetics, and nutrition professionals; 10.2 Comparing personal interests, aptitudes, and abilities with those required in food service, food science, dietetics, and nutrition careers; Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
38
Food and Nutrition Content Area Standards
10.3 Evaluating career options related to food service, food science, dietetics, and nutrition, including labor market projections, educational requirements, job responsibilities, salary, benefits, employers' expectations, and working environment; and 10.4 Developing a career plan in food and nutrition that reflects upward career mobility and opportunities for entrepreneurship.
39
Housing and Furnishings Content Area Standards
Listed below are the content area standards for housing and furnishings.
Standard 1
Housing Decisions Students will understand the factors and options that influence housing decisions.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 1.1 1.2 1.3 1.4 1.5 1.6 1.7 1.8 1.9 Assessing factors that influence needs for living space; Identifying and evaluating housing alternatives and the factors that influence housing decisions; Identifying the factors and explaining the process for determining the appropriate percentage of income needed for housing; Analyzing the characteristics of a neighborhood and community for desirability of housing; Identifying personal and safety housing requirements for individuals, including children, the elderly, and individuals with special needs; Comparing needs for housing at different stages of the life cycle; Comparing renting with owning a home; Evaluating the effects of shared housing on individual rights, responsibilities, privacy, and cooperation; Comparing remodeling with relocating;
1.10 Interpreting the components of a lease, rental agreement, or purchase contract; 1.11 Investigating ways to finance a home purchase; 1.12 Identifying and describing community agencies that provide services to help individuals and families with housing needs and concerns; 1.13 Researching landlord and tenant rights and responsibilities; and 1.14 Researching public and private resources available to help in planning modifications of living environments for individuals with special needs.
Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
40
Housing and Furnishings Content Area Standards
Standard 2
Home Furnishings, Accessories, and Equipment Students will understand factors influencing the selection and care of home furnishings, accessories, and equipment.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 2.1 2.2 2.3 2.4 2.5 2.6 2.7 2.8 Describing factors that influence selection of home furnishings and equipment; Assessing basic furnishings and equipment needs for individuals and families; Identifying factors that determine quality in home furnishings and equipment; Developing a plan and budget for furnishing a room or home or both for a specified situation; Comparing sources and alternatives for purchasing new and used home furnishings and equipment; Recommending appropriate care, repair, and maintenance of home furnishings and equipment; Identifying and predicting the impact of new technology on home furnishings and equipment; and Recycling, refinishing, or restoring home furnishings.
Standard 3 Safe and Healthy Living Environments Students will understand the importance of a safe and healthy living environment.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 3.1 3.2 3.3 3.4 3.5 3.6 3.7 Describing reasons for having a safe, clean, and orderly living environment; Describing and scheduling routine care for interiors; Describing potential health and safety hazards in the home and practices that can prevent accidents and illnesses; Developing a plan for handling home emergencies; Developing a plan that includes cleaning techniques that save time and energy; Comparing the costs, energy, time, skills, and tools needed to perform home maintenance and improvement tasks; Describing ways in which special devices, equipment, and strategies can be used to make the home environment safer and more comfortable for individuals with special needs; and Analyzing floor plans and elevations for safety, organization, and maintenance.
3.8
Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
Housing and Furnishings Content Area Standards
41
Standard 4 Elements and Principles of Design Students will understand how the elements and principles of design are used to create an aesthetically pleasing living environment.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 4.1 4.2 Applying the elements and principles of design to evaluate the aesthetics of a living environment; and Using the elements and principles of design to select home furnishings and equipment.
Standard 5 Color Theory Students will understand the theory and use of color in living environments.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 5.1 5.2 5.3 5.4 5.5 5.6 Identifying color terminology and color schemes; Using a color wheel to identify examples of various color schemes; Analyzing the use of color for psychological effect; Applying and evaluating color schemes to achieve an aesthetically pleasing living environment; Explaining the science of color perception; and Using tints and shades to create a desired effect in a living environment.
Standard 6 Space Planning Students will understand principles and factors that influence space planning.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 6.1 6.2 6.3 6.4 6.5 6.6 Defining and applying traffic patterns in designing space for living, work, and storage; Evaluating living space to meet the needs of an individual or a family; Designing a plan for remodeling or redecorating a room to meet the needs of an individual or a family; Describing factors to consider in planning areas for living, storage, and work; Designing and planning living space to meet individual, family, and group needs throughout the life cycle; Evaluating a living environment to meet the requirements of individuals with special needs;
Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
42
Housing and Furnishings Content Area Standards
6.7 6.8
Exploring the uses of technology in space planning; for example, computer-assisted drafting programs; and Suggesting ways to incorporate outdoor space into the living environment.
Standard 7
Textiles and Materials in Living Environments Students will understand the characteristics and maintenance of textiles and materials used in living environments.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 7.1 7.2 7.3 7.4 7.5 7.6 Identifying textiles and materials commonly used in living environments; Describing the characteristics of textiles and materials used in living environments; Identifying and selecting textiles and materials appropriate for use in living environments; Identifying and describing common floor, counter, and wall coverings; Explaining proper procedures for maintaining textiles and materials used in living environments; and Describing the influences of science and technology on textiles, materials, and finishes used in living environments.
Standard 8
Housing and Furniture Styles Students will understand the relationships between historical styles and design trends in housing and furniture.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 8.1 8.2 8.3 8.4 Identifying factors that influence trends and cycles in housing and furniture; Identifying recognized architectural styles and determining cultural influences; Identifying major periods of furniture styles and determining cultural influences; and Identifying housing and furniture styles that have evolved as the result of technology.
Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
Housing and Furnishings Content Area Standards
43
Standard 9
Careers Related to Interior Design, Furnishings, and Maintenance Students will understand careers related to interior design, furnishings, and maintenance.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 9.1 9.2 9.3 Identifying characteristics of effective interior design, furnishings, and maintenance professionals; Comparing personal interests, aptitudes, and abilities with those required in interior design, furnishings, and maintenance careers; Evaluating career and maintenance, requirements, job expectations, and options related to interior design, furnishings, including labor market projections, educational responsibilities, salary, benefits, employers' working environment; and
9.4
Developing a career plan in interior design, furnishings, and maintenance that reflects upward career mobility and opportunities for entrepreneurship.
Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
44
Individual and Family Health Content Area Standards Listed below are the content area standards for individual and family health.
Standard 1
Health and Safety Students will understand personal health care and safety.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 1.1 1.2 1.3 1.4 1.5 1.6 1.7 Defining health and identifying the characteristics of a healthy person; Explaining the relationship of exercise, rest, and good nutrition to physical fitness, job performance, and health; Identifying symptoms of physical and mental illnesses; Maintaining accurate personal and family health histories; Identifying the health care options of the ill and convalescent; Identifying supplies and equipment needed to provide appropriate health care in the home; and Explaining proper procedures to care for individuals who are ill.
Standard 2
Mental Wellness Students will understand the importance of mental wellness in life situations.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 2.1 2.2 2.3 2.4 2.5 2.6 2.7 2.8 Analyzing self-esteem and its relationship to mental wellness; Defining emotions and explaining the relationship of managing emotions to maintaining mental health; Using strategies to build self-esteem; Evaluating the need for self-esteem throughout the life cycle; Comparing appropriate and inappropriate behavior for expressing emotions, including anger management and conflict resolution; Describing and comparing how positive and negative attitudes affect behavior and health; Practicing positive ways to express emotions; Identifying strategies to communicate with individuals and families when they express negative emotions;
Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
Individual and Family Health Content Area Standards
45
2.9
Devising ways of dealing with individuals and families who express negative attitudes; and 2.10 Examining personal priorities in resolving inner conflict.
Standard 3
Stress Management Students will understand the management of stress.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 3.1 3.2 3.3 Defining stress and stress management; Identifying stress-reducing strategies and comparing their effectiveness; and Analyzing scenarios of stressful family situations and determining ways in which to minimize stress.
Standard 4
Nutrition and Body Systems Students will understand the importance of good nutrition for maintaining healthy bodies, preventing disease, and promoting wellness.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 4.1 4.2 4.3 4.4 4.5 Explaining the functions of body systems and describing practices that promote wellness; Determining appropriate caloric needs to maintain, lose, or gain weight; Comparing caloric intake and energy expenditure throughout the family life cycle; Evaluating dietary patterns for short-range and long-range health implications; Evaluating claims made for dietary supplements, diet aids, and fad diets; identifying appropriate uses; and comparing costs and benefits; and Preparing a profile of symptoms to illustrate various eating disorders and relating that profile to abusive behavior.
4.6
Standard 5
Responsible Behavior Students will understand the importance of responsible behavior to promote optimum health.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 5.1 5.2 Identifying high-risk health behaviors that affect individuals and society; Identifying different types of abuse and their symptoms;
Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
46
Individual and Family Health Content Area Standards
5.3 5.4 5.5 5.6 5.7 5.8
Using the decision-making process to make responsible health choices; Identifying various types of substance abuse and the consequence of substance abuse; Identifying types and symptoms of verbal, physical, and emotional abuse and the effects of abuse on physical and emotional health; Identifying resources that provide support systems for substance abusers or individuals who are being abused; Assessing the social costs of high-risk behaviors; and Explaining the social and global implications of sexually transmitted diseases.
Standard 6 Managing Peer Pressure Students will understand how peer pressure and manipulation affect behavior and health choices.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 6.1 6.2 6.3 Defining manipulative behavior and peer pressure; Describing and using strategies that prevent manipulation; and Recognizing the sources of peer pressure and analyzing manipulative behavior.
Standard 7 Communicable and Noncommunicable Infections and Diseases Students will understand the prevention, care, and control of infections and diseases.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 7.1 7.2 7.3 7.4 Defining communicable and noncommunicable infections and diseases; Identifying procedures to care for individuals with infections and diseases; Describing universal precautions for the prevention of common infections and diseases; and Promoting responsible behaviors that help in preventing and controlling communicable infections and diseases.
Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
Individual and Family Health Content Area Standards
47
Standard 8 Emergency Care and Preparedness Students will understand ways to promote safety and provide emergency care.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 8.1 8.2 8.3 8.4 8.5 Identifying health hazards in the home, school, community, and workplace; Describing strategies to make the home, school, and community safe for all individuals; Using basic first-aid techniques and explaining emergency procedures; Explaining preparedness strategies for emergencies and disasters; and Preparing emergency plans for families to use in various emergency situations.
Standard 9 Health and the Environment Students will understand that environmental conditions affect health and well-being.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 9.1 9.2 9.3 9.4 Describing health problems related to environmental conditions; Assessing environmental health risks and their impact on the quality of life; Recommending actions for the prevention or correction of health problems related to environmental conditions; and Reviewing current environmental laws and regulations.
Standard 10 Community Health Resources Students will understand the community health care services available to maintain physical and emotional health.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 10.1 Comparing and evaluating programs and information regarding health and well-being; and 10.2 Identifying and evaluating community services and organizations that provide for individual and family emergency and health care needs.
Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
48
Individual and Family Health Content Area Standards
Standard 11 Careers Related to Family and Human Services Students will understand careers related to family and human services.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 11.1 Identifying characteristics of effective family and human services professionals; 11.2 Comparing personal interests, aptitudes, and abilities with those required in family and human services careers; 11.3 Evaluating career options related to family and human services, including labor market projections, educational requirements, job responsibilities, salary, benefits, employers' expectations, and working environment; and 11.4 Developing a career plan in family and human services that reflects upward career mobility and opportunities for entrepreneurship.
Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
49
Transferable and Employability Skills Content Area Standards Listed below are the content area standards for transferable and employability skills
Standard 1
Career Awareness Students will understand home economics careers and technology career pathways.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 1.1 1.2 1.3 Identifying the content areas for consumer and family studies and the related career pathways and opportunities; Describing career pathways and strategies for obtaining employment and advancing in various career pathways; and Researching the benefits, educational requirements, and costs of preparing to become a home economics careers and technology teacher in California's public school system.
Standard 2
Personal, Interpersonal, and Communication Skills Students will understand how the development of personal, group dynamics, and interpersonal skills affects work, personal, and family life.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 2.1 2.2 Exhibiting positive attitudes, such as self-confidence, honesty, perseverance, initiative, and self-discipline; Demonstrating strategies to manage resources, including time and energy; practicing decision making; planning; and establishing goals and priorities; Explaining ways to work cooperatively, share responsibilities, accept supervision, and assume leadership roles; Describing effective working relationships across age, gender, and cultural groups; Assessing and practicing effective nonverbal, oral, and written communication skills appropriate for various relationships and situations; and Designing and evaluating a plan to strengthen personal and interpersonal skills, including understanding the distinguishing qualities of effective leaders.
2.3 2.4 2.5
2.6
Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
50
Transferable and Employability Skills Content Area Standards
Standard 3
Thinking and Problem-Solving Skills Students will understand critical and creative thinking, logical reasoning, and problem-solving skills.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 3.1 3.2 3.3 Identifying issues and problems in work, personal, and family life; Applying creative thinking skills to identify new ways to perform tasks or solve problems; and Considering multiple options for solving problems and applying appropriate problem-solving strategies.
Standard 4
Employability and Professionalism Students will understand the knowledge, skills, attitudes, and behaviors needed to obtain and maintain employment, including professionalism, image, and standards.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 4.1 4.2 4.3 4.4 4.5 4.6 4.7 4.8 Defining and describing employability skills; Describing the expectations of employers, job-related responsibilities, positive work habits, work ethics, and ethical behavior; Applying job search and acquisition skills, such as preparing job applications, resumes, and career portfolios; Defining professionalism, including honesty, integrity, responsibility, and confidentiality; Evaluating dress, grooming, and personal hygiene appropriate for various job situations; Analyzing skills needed to work effectively and efficiently with supervisors; Describing and practicing behaviors and attitudes that contribute to success in job retention and promotion; and Defining ways in which employees may have to adapt to changes in the workplace.
Standard 5
Balancing Personal, Family, and Work Life Students will understand management strategies that help them in balancing their personal, family, and work life.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 5.1 5.2 Describing and relating the management process to a balanced personal, family, and work life; Applying management skills, including negotiation, to home and work life;
Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
Transferable and Employability Skills Content Area Standards
51
5.3 5.4
5.5 5.6
Examining various roles and expectations that influence the ability to balance personal, family, and work life; Explaining the ways in which technology affects family, work, and personal life and evaluating its use in managing and balancing responsibilities; Applying and using the decision-making process to resolve situations with a potential for conflict and stress; and Analyzing ways in which to integrate personal and family needs, values, and goals.
Standard 6
Team Building and Leadership Students will understand the concepts and skills needed for teamwork, leadership, and citizenship to succeed in their personal, family, career, and community life.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 6.1 Identifying, comparing, and analyzing the characteristics and benefits of teamwork, leadership, and citizenship in the home, workplace, and community; Identifying characteristics of effective leaders and team members; Developing teamwork and leadership skills by participating in FHA-HERO activities; Participating in FHA-HERO community service activities related to home economics careers and technology; Planning and organizing an FHA-HERO meeting or activity; Applying teamwork and leadership skills to personal, family, and work life; and Using and applying knowledge of the basic rules of parliamentary procedure.
6.2 6.3 6.4 6.5 6.6 6.7
Standard 7
Transferring Consumer and Family Studies Skills to Careers Students will understand how knowledge, skills, attitudes, and behaviors learned in consumer and family studies can be transferred to advanced education and training in home economics career pathways and paid employment.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 7.1 7.2 7.3 Describing and explaining how consumer and family studies skills can be transferred to advanced training or education and careers; Assessing how FHA-HERO leadership and teamwork skills enhance employability; and Describing the need and capacity for lifelong learning.
Statements in boldface type designate essential benchmarks that must be taught and assessed in the CFS Comprehensive Core.
Home Economics Related Occupations
Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising
Child Development and Education
Food Service and Hospitality
Consumer Services
Hospitality, Tourism, and Recreation
Familiy and Human Services
Interior Design, Furnishings, and Maintenance
Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition
Part II
Home Economics Related Occupations
Child Development and Education
56
Over view of Child Development and Education Career opportunities in Child Development and Education have never been greater.
Enrollment in formal preschool programs has increased by 44 percent over the past ten years, and employment of preschool workers and teachers' aides is projected to increase much faster than the average for all occupations through 2005.
Among the California occupations expected to undergo the largest growth are teachers in preschool, kindergarten, elementary school, and high school.
Those with expertise and training in meeting special needs will have an even greater employment advantage.
Some of the other job opportunities include preschool director, children's center supervisor, and child psychologist.
Teaching children and helping with their development offer unlimited opportunities for challenging and personally rewarding careers.
Child Development and Education Program A Child Development and Education program focuses on preparing students to work with children or to enter the teaching profession.
Students pursuing a career in this industry gain a solid foundation for any career that involves working with children.
Courses in a Home Economics Related Occupations (HERO) program, funded by a school district or regional occupational center program (ROCP), enable students to develop the knowledge, skills, attitudes, and behaviors necessary to interact with, guide, and instruct children of all ages.
The course of study includes awareness of the profession; professional standards; work site operational and organizational procedures; standards, licensing, regulations, and codes; safety, emergency, and disaster procedures; child growth and development; positive interaction, guidance, and discipline; developmentally appropriate practices and curriculum; nutrition and health practices; interaction with families and communities; instructional support; resources and materials; and recreational activities.
Child Development and Education students also learn employment and management skills for careers in child care and development and teaching.
FHA-HERO, a pre-professional organization for students, provides cocurricular leadership and career development opportunities in HERO instructional programs.
Effective programs incorporate FHA-HERO as a teaching strategy for developing interpersonal, leadership, citizenship, and career skills.
Child Development and Education
57
This HERO program serves as the capstone course in the secondary-level Home Economics Careers and Technology Child Development and Education career pathway sequence.
The program continues a course sequence that includes a Consumer and Family Studies Comprehensive Core and a specialized content area course in child development and guidance.
The shaded portion of Chart 3.1, "Child Development and Education Career Pathway Options," illustrates a sample course sequence for Child Development and Education.
The appendix, "Overview of HECT Course Sequences, Grades Nine Through Twelve," provides additional information about the design of course sequences.
Characteristics and Use of the Content Standards The HERO Child Development and Education content standards build on the knowledge, skills, attitudes, and behaviors outlined in the Consumer and Family Studies child development and guidance content standards.
Employability and FHA-HERO leadership skills are integrated into the standards.
These standards are intended for use by secondary-level instructors and administrators to strengthen curriculum, instruction, and assessment.
Secondary-level instructors will also use these standards in collaborating with postsecondary instructors to articulate and sequence instruction, thereby eliminating unnecessary duplication of content at both levels of education.
See also the section "Use of the Content Standards," described in "Overview of Home Economics Careers and Technology Programs," at the beginning of this document.
The standards delineated in this section reflect content identified by representatives of the profession and by instructors of secondary and postsecondary Child Development and Education programs.
Each content standard contains the following components: Title of the standard: The title of each standard identifies the concept addressed in the content.
Statement of the standard: Each standard addresses broadly what a student should know.
Benchmarks: Statements listed below each standard describe what students should be able to do to meet the broad standard.
Careers in Child Development and Education, a curriculum guide, supports standards-based instruction and assessment in this career pathway program.1 The Home Economics Careers and Technology Unit, Standards and High School Development Division, California Department of Education, also provides technical assistance to instructors and administrators.
1
Careers in Child Development and Education.
Prepared by the Home Economics Careers and Technology Unit.
Sacramento: California Department of Education, 1999.
58
Chart 3.1
Child Development and Education Career Pathway Options Home Economics Related Occupations (HERO) Grades 11 and 12 HERO: District- or ROCP-Funded Programs Introduction to Teaching Careers (Optional) Careers in Education Careers in Child Development
Consumer and Family Studies (CFS) Grades 10, 11, and 12 CFS Specialized Courses
Grades 6­10 CFS Foundation Courses Child Development and Guidance Grades 9 and 10 CFS Core Courses
Consumer Education Life Management I* Economics for Living
Careers in Consumer Services
Community College
Middle Grades Exploratory CFS Courses
Family Living and Parenting Education Life Management II* Fashion, Textiles, and Apparel Introduction to Fashion Careers (Optional)
Careers in Family and Human Services Four-Year College or University Careers in Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising Employment
Exploratory Home Economics Careers and Technology (Grades 6 and 7)
Teen Living (Grade 8) Grades 10, 11, and 12 CFS Specialized Course
Nutritional Science
Careers in Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition Apprenticeship Careers in Food Service and Hospitality
Parenting and Personal Relationships (Grades 7 and 8) Food and Nutrition *Focuses on managing work and family.
These courses are recommended for all career pathways.
**May be offered as part of several career pathways.
Individual and Family Health**
Introduction to Hospitality Careers (Optional) Careers in Hospitality, Tourism, and Recreation
Private Postsecondary Programs/Training
FHA-HERO leadership and career development are integral to the instructional program for grades 6­12.
Housing and Furnishings Environmental Design
Careers in Interior Design, Furnishings, and Maintenance
59
Child Development and Education Career Pathway Standards
Listed below are the career pathway standards for the child development and education industry.
Standard 1
Child Development and Education Industr y Awareness Students will understand the breadth of the child development and education industry, including career opportunities and the role of this industry in state and local economies.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 1.1 1.2 1.3 Describing the relationship between the child development and education industry and state and local economies; Explaining the functions and roles of the various professional levels of child development and education; Explaining how the interdependence of various career roles contributes to the success of the child development and education program or work site; Describing career paths and strategies for obtaining employment and advancing in the child development and education industry; Describing the organization, structure, and hierarchy, including relationships and interactions among personnel, in child care or education facilities; Assessing the attitudes, skills, and preparation required for careers in the child development and education industry; Examining job descriptions and related opportunities of various positions in the child development and education industry; Identifying the knowledge, skills, aptitudes, and behaviors that can be transferred to higher levels of employment within the career pathway or to other fields; and Conducting research of legislative, economic, and social trends that have an impact on the child development and education industry.
1.4 1.5
1.6 1.7 1.8
1.9
Standard 2
Professional Standards/Dignity of Work Students will understand what constitutes professional behavior, image, and standards.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by:
60
Child Development and Education Career Pathway Standards
2.1
Describing a code of ethics and identifying the components of professionalism, including integrity, initiative, confidentiality, and respect at the work site; Explaining the interdependence and importance of all jobs to the success of an organization; Describing and practicing professional and ethical behaviors; Identifying clothing, grooming, and personal hygiene appropriate for the job; Describing and practicing professional interactions with children, staff, and families; Explaining ways in which on-the-job decisions can affect the quality of work; Describing job-related stress and strategies to manage stress; Explaining employers' and employees' rights and responsibilities; and Determining ways to maintain competency within the industry.
2.2 2.3 2.4 2.5 2.6 2.7 2.8 2.9
Standard 3
Work Site Operational and Organizational Procedures Students will understand operational and organizational procedures in various child development and educational facilities as required.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 3.1 3.2 3.3 3.4 3.5 Comparing operational procedures at various work sites and explaining the importance of those procedures; Describing and maintaining a clean, safe, and functional work environment; Preparing and maintaining records, correspondence, and forms through various means, including computers and other technology; Describing and performing operational procedures related to inventory control, maintenance, storage, security, and payments; Preparing and maintaining child and classroom records, such as attendance, observations, evaluations, student portfolios, and illness, incident, accident, and injury reports; Following work-site rules for children's use of supplies and equipment; Using business procedures, including, but not limited to, contracts, billing, budgets, collections, payroll, and taxes; Explaining and using safe procedures and techniques for materials, tools, and equipment; and
3.6 3.7 3.8
Child Development and Education Career Pathway Standards
61
3.9
Explaining workforce management strategies, such as shared responsibility, negotiation, planning, and decision making.
Standard 4
Standards, Licensing, Regulations, and Codes Students will understand child development and education standards, licensing, regulations, and codes.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 4.1 4.2 4.3 Identifying standards and licensing regulations for child development and education facilities; Explaining the educational and industry-related requirements for staff members in the child development and education industry; Describing and practicing health, safety, regulatory, and procedural requirements for the work site, such as the proper use and storage of equipment, supplies, and toxic materials; Describing the indicators of child abuse and neglect and the role of the caregiver or teacher as a mandated reporter; Explaining such policies as staff-child interaction, curriculum, staffparent interaction, health, safety, nutrition, administration, physical environment, evaluation, and staff development; Complying with laws and regulations affecting the needs, interests, and rights of young children and adolescents; Explaining how local, state, and federal regulations and laws are enforced by regulatory agencies, including the California Occupational Safety and Health Administration (Cal/OSHA); and Explaining employers' and employees' responsibilities and procedural requirements for complying with laws and regulations.
4.4 4.5
4.6 4.7
4.8
Standard 5
Safety, Emergency, and Disaster Procedures Students will understand safety, emergency, and disaster procedures at the work site.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 5.1 Comparing state and federal environmental and safety regulations, including those for the California Occupational Safety and Health Administration (Cal/OSHA), as they relate to the child development and education industry; Identifying factors and following procedures that contribute to a safe and healthy environment; Describing and following procedures related to safety, including emergency and disaster preparedness plans; Identifying items needed for first aid and other emergency procedures;
5.2 5.3 5.4
62
Child Development and Education Career Pathway Standards
5.5 5.6
Practicing proper first aid, CPR, and other emergency procedures; Describing common accidents at the work site and recommending safety procedures, including lifting and handling, to reduce and prevent accidents; Using correct procedures for completing accident reports and records; Practicing procedures for preventing the spread of illness; Evaluating the facility and making recommendations for the safety and well-being of the children; and
5.7 5.8 5.9
5.10 Analyzing the purpose of and information in Material Safety Data Sheets (MSDSs).
Standard 6
Child Growth and Development Students will understand children's growth and development in the following developmental areas: physical, intellectual, emotional, and social.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 6.1 6.2 6.3 6.4 6.5 Describing developmental patterns and differences among infants, toddlers, and children; Describing hereditary and environmental factors that influence the development of infants, toddlers, and children; Providing for infants, toddlers, and children with special needs; Describing how the family and culture(s) influence the development of children; and Relating the various learning experiences that promote intellectual development.
Standard 7
Positive Interaction, Guidance, and Discipline Students will understand the principles of positive interaction, guidance, and discipline.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 7.1 7.2 7.3 7.4 7.5 Identifying and using types of positive guidance techniques based on the stages of children's development; Defining a positive self-image, self-esteem, independence, and respect for oneself and others; and helping children to develop these attitudes; Describing the adult's role in creating and managing the environment to develop the child's independence and self-control; Identifying possible causes of behavior problems and suggesting possible solutions; and Describing the importance of a positive staff-parent relationship as it relates to the social and emotional development of the child.
Child Development and Education Career Pathway Standards
63
Standard 8
Developmentally Appropriate Practices and Curriculum Activities Students will understand developmentally appropriate practices and curriculum activities.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 8.1 8.2 8.3 8.4 Identifying uses of technology in a child development and education setting; Providing experiences that promote both large- and small-muscle development; Implementing activities that increase children's understanding of cultural diversity; Planning and implementing a variety of activities, such as language arts, social studies, mathematics, art, science, nutrition and health, music and movement, culinary arts, physical education, self-help, and social interaction; Assisting in planning and implementing a balanced daily routine that reflects a high-quality program, which includes the following types of activities: indoor/outdoor, quiet/active, individual/small group/large group, large muscle/small muscle, and child initiated/staff initiated; Identifying and comparing the different curriculum models used in child development and education facilities; Identifying and evaluating the different learning theories and the application of those theories in child development and education facilities; Writing and implementing lesson plans to include components, such as objectives, materials, activities, and evaluation; Using teaching techniques appropriate for working with children of varying ages, learning styles, modalities, and cultural backgrounds;
8.5
8.6 8.7
8.8 8.9
8.10 Explaining the significance of taxonomies, such as Bloom's Taxonomy of Educational Objectives, and providing examples of its use in planning and assessing learning;2 8.11 Identifying sources and applications of quality indicators of child development and education programs; 8.12 Planning developmentally appropriate activities for multiage groups; 8.13 Providing instruction to individual students or small groups of students in a classroom or other learning environment; 2
Taxonomy of Educational Objectives: The Classification of Educational Goals.
Handbook I: Cognitive Domain.
Edited by Benjamin S. Bloom.
1956.
Reprint, New York: Longman Publishing Group, 1984.
64
Child Development and Education Career Pathway Standards
8.14 Identifying and describing various disabilities and providing help and instruction to children with disabilities; and 8.15 Describing and providing instruction to meet the needs of gifted students.
Standard 9
Nutrition and Health Practices Students will understand the principles and practices of good nutrition, health, and safety for infants and children.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 9.1 9.2 9.3 9.4 9.5 9.6 9.7 9.8 Recognizing, describing, and reporting signs and symptoms of illness, injury, or discomfort in infants, toddlers, and children; Describing procedures and regulations for storing and administering medications; Using procedures to clean a facility that follow a logical sequence; Describing procedures for preventing the spread of illnesses, including those for blood-borne pathogens; Following appropriate sanitation and hygiene techniques for infants, toddlers, children, and staff; Using sanitary procedures in handling, preparing, and serving food; Assisting in planning, preparing, and serving nutritional snacks and meals; and Identifying techniques for preparing snacks and meals that foster independent eating practices and promote good nutrition and hygiene habits.
Standard 10 Interaction with Families and Communities Students will understand how to interact effectively with families and communities.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 10.1 Explaining issues of diversity and exhibiting sensitivity to cultural differences; 10.2 Describing problems that are common to communication and interaction with families and their communities; 10.3 Analyzing how cultural differences affect communication within and among families and communities; 10.4 Describing how to be effective in communicating with families and their communities; and 10.5 Assessing the contributions of family members and the community in the educational process.
Child Development and Education Career Pathway Standards
65
Standard 11 Instructional Support Students will understand the role of the instructional staff in supporting the learning process.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 11.1 Supervising infants, toddlers, and children on planned educational and recreational trips; 11.2 Maintaining specified behavior standards in classrooms, libraries, halls, and bathrooms and on the school grounds; 11.3 Describing typical learning problems that students encounter in a given content area, such as reading, writing, language arts, mathematics, or social studies; 11.4 Describing effective strategies that reinforce instruction, answer questions, and remediate problems; 11.5 Using games, skits, puppets, and other instructional materials and activities to motivate learning and reinforce concepts; 11.6 Applying effective methods and procedures to build a supportive learning environment; 11.7 Using scoring rubrics and test keys to grade student tests and papers; 11.8 Describing procedures for contacting parents regarding student attendance and classroom performance; 11.9 Using positive techniques for providing feedback on student work; and 11.10 Providing instructional assistance to individuals or groups.
Standard 12 Resources and Materials Students will understand the role of teaching materials and resources to enhance classroom instruction in child development and education programs.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 12.1 Using instructional technology, including, but not limited to, computers, calculators, projectors, scanners, and compact disc players; 12.2 Selecting and developing teaching materials and resources; 12.3 Identifying types and sources of quality, age-appropriate materials and equipment; 12.4 Describing copyright laws governing the development and use of teaching materials; and 12.5 Operating equipment related to the development of teaching materials, such as audiovisual equipment, typewriters, copiers, videocassette recorders, laminators, stencil makers, paper cutters, and computers.
66
Child Development and Education Career Pathway Standards
Standard 13 Recreational Activities Students will understand how to select and conduct appropriate recreational activities for individuals and groups.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 13.1 Assessing the recreational interests and needs of a group and conducting recreational activities; 13.2 Assisting in developing, implementing, and supervising recreational activities that motivate interest; 13.3 Cooperating with other staff members in conducting planned recreational activities; 13.4 Explaining games, activities, materials, and equipment, using ageappropriate language; 13.5 Evaluating the development of motor skills in relation to recreational activities; and 13.6 Explaining how to safely use materials and equipment needed for games and activities.
Standard 14 Personal, Interpersonal, and Communication Skills Students will understand how personal, interpersonal, and communication skills influence employability.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 14.1 Describing interpersonal skills that enhance relationships at the work site, such as working cooperatively, communicating effectively, sharing responsibilities, and exercising leadership; 14.2 Analyzing the importance of such personal skills as a positive attitude, self-confidence, honesty, integrity, and self-discipline as these characteristics pertain to work, personal, and family life; 14.3 Explaining ways in which to resolve conflicts, use negotiation skills, and communicate resolutions across gender, age, and cultural groups; 14.4 Assessing the importance of effective nonverbal, oral, and written communication skills in getting and keeping a job; 14.5 Using appropriate communication skills, including correct telephone, facsimile, and e-mail etiquette; and 14.6 Interpreting nonverbal communication and responding appropriately.
Standard 15 Thinking and Problem-Solving Skills Students will exhibit critical and creative thinking, logical reasoning, and problem-solving skills.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by:
Child Development and Education Career Pathway Standards
67
15.1 Identifying issues and problems in the child development and education industry and offering possible solutions; 15.2 Considering multiple options for completing work tasks and applying appropriate problem-solving strategies to work-related issues; and 15.3 Applying creative thinking skills to identify and present new ways to perform work effectively.
Standard 16 Balancing Personal, Family, and Work Responsibilities Students will understand management strategies needed to achieve balance in work, personal, and family life.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 16.1 Identifying and analyzing multiple roles as members of the workforce, families, and communities; 16.2 Identifying and analyzing resources that help in managing the responsibilities of multiple roles; 16.3 Identifying and applying management strategies to achieve balance in work and family roles; and 16.4 Evaluating effectiveness in balancing responsibilities at home and work.
Standard 17 Teamwork and Leadership Students will understand the teamwork and leadership concepts and skills needed to succeed in work, personal, family, and community life.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 17.1 Identifying, comparing, and analyzing the characteristics and benefits of teamwork, leadership, and citizenship in the workplace and community; 17.2 Defining leadership roles in work and community life; 17.3 Identifying and practicing strategies for effective teamwork, leadership, and citizenship in the workplace and community; 17.4 Developing skills in teamwork, leadership, and citizenship by participating in FHA-HERO activities; 17.5 Analyzing and using written and professional resources that help in developing skills in teamwork and leadership; and 17.6 Assessing how skills in teamwork and leadership enhance employability.
Home Economics Related Occupations
Consumer Services
70
Over view of Consumer Ser vices
With over 31 million residents, California boasts the largest population of consumers of goods and services of any state in the nation.
As a result, the field of Consumer Services offers unlimited career choices, including jobs in helping customers, representing product lines, and developing productmarketing plans for major industries.
Possible careers in this pathway include credit counselors, consumer information reporters and writers, consumer affairs directors, consumer advocates, and energy efficiency specialists.
Consumer Services Program Courses in a Home Economics Related Occupations (HERO) program, funded by a school district or regional occupational center program (ROCP), enable students to develop the knowledge, skills, attitudes, and behaviors necessary to succeed in the consumer services industry.
The course of study includes awareness of the industry; consumer laws and regulations; consumer rights and responsibilities; global influences; customer relationships; consumer public relations; energy, environmental, and resource management; consumer product development, testing, and demonstration; and financial management.
Consumer Services students also learn employment and management skills for careers in consumer communications; energy, environmental, and resource management; product development, testing, and demonstration; personal and family financial management; and personal services.
FHA-HERO, a pre-professional organization for students, provides cocurricular leadership and career development opportunities in HERO instructional programs.
Effective programs incorporate FHA-HERO as a teaching strategy for developing interpersonal, leadership, citizenship, and career skills.
This HERO program serves as the capstone course in the secondary-level Home Economics Careers and Technology Consumer Services career pathway sequence.
The program continues a course sequence that includes a Consumer and Family Studies Comprehensive Core and a specialized content area course in consumer education.
The shaded portion of Chart 4.1, "Consumer Services Career Pathway Options," illustrates a sample course sequence for Consumer Services.
The appendix, "Overview of
Chart 4.1
Consumer Services Career Pathway Options Home Economics Related Occupations (HERO) Grades 11 and 12 HERO: District- or ROCP-Funded Programs Introduction to Teaching Careers (Optional) Careers in Education Careers in Child Development
Consumer and Family Studies (CFS) Grades 10, 11, and 12 CFS Specialized Courses
Grades 6­10 CFS Foundation Courses Child Development and Guidance Grades 9 and 10 CFS Core Courses
Consumer Education Life Management I* Economics for Living
Careers in Consumer Services
Community College
Middle Grades Exploratory CFS Courses
Family Living and Parenting Education Life Management II* Fashion, Textiles, and Apparel Introduction to Fashion Careers (Optional)
Careers in Family and Human Services Four-Year College or University Careers in Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising Employment
Exploratory Home Economics Careers and Technology (Grades 6 and 7)
Teen Living (Grade 8) Nutritional Science Grades 10, 11, and 12 CFS Specialized Course
Careers in Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition Apprenticeship Careers in Food Service and Hospitality
Parenting and Personal Relationships (Grades 7 and 8)
Individual and Family Health** Food and Nutrition *Focuses on managing work and family.
These courses are recommended for all career pathways.
**May be offered as part of several career pathways.
Introduction to Hospitality Careers (Optional) Careers in Hospitality, Tourism, and Recreation
Private Postsecondary Programs/Training
FHA-HERO leadership and career development are integral to the instructional program for grades 6­12.
Housing and Furnishings Environmental Design
Careers in Interior Design, Furnishings, and Maintenance
71
72
Consumer Services
HECT Course Sequences, Grades Nine Through Twelve," provides additional information about the design of course sequences.
Characteristics and Use of the Content Standards The HERO Consumer Services content standards build on the knowledge, skills, and attitudes in the Consumer and Family Studies consumer education content standards.
Employability and FHA-HERO leadership skills are integrated into the standards.
These standards are intended for use by secondary-level instructors and administrators to strengthen curriculum, instruction, and assessment.
Secondary-level instructors will also use these standards in collaborating with postsecondary instructors to articulate and sequence instruction, thereby eliminating unnecessary duplication of content at both levels of education.
See also the section "Use of the Content Standards," described in "Overview of Home Economics Careers and Technology Programs," at the beginning of this document.
The standards delineated in this section reflect content identified by representatives of the profession and by instructors of secondary and postsecondary courses in Consumer Services programs.
Each content standard contains the following components: Title of the standard: The title of each standard identifies the concept addressed in the content.
Statement of the standard: Each standard addresses broadly what a student should know.
Benchmarks: Statements listed below each standard describe what students should be able to do to meet the broad standard.
Technical assistance and resources for implementing standards-based Home Economics Careers and Technology course sequences and programs in Consumer Services are available from the Home Economics Careers and Technology Unit, Standards and High School Development Division, California Department of Education.
73
Consumer Services Career Pathway Standards
Listed below are the career pathway standards for the consumer services industry.
Standard 1
Consumer Services Industry Awareness Students will understand the breadth of the consumer services industry, including career opportunities and the role of this industry in state and local economies.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 1.1 1.2 Describing the scope of the consumer services industry; Investigating entry-level, technical-level, and professional-level consumer services careers and the education or training requirements; Identifying the ways in which industries and companies provide consumer services; Describing the role and effect of this industry on the consumer and on the state's economy; Identifying the role of consumer affairs personnel in an organization; Assessing the personal qualifications, interests, aptitudes, knowledge, and skills necessary to succeed in the consumer services industry; Describing career paths and strategies for obtaining employment and advancing in the consumer services industry; Describing the impact of information technology on consumers and the consumer services industry; Conducting research of legislative, economic, and social trends that have an impact on careers in the consumer services industry;
1.3 1.4 1.5 1.6
1.7 1.8 1.9
1.10 Describing the ways in which national and international policies and procedures affect the daily operations of a consumer services organization; and 1.11 Identifying the knowledge, skills, aptitudes, and behaviors that can be transferred to higher levels of employment within the career pathway or to other fields.
74
Consumer Services Career Pathway Standards
Standard 2
Professional Standards/Dignity of Work Students will understand what constitutes professional behavior, image, and standards.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 2.1 Describing a code of ethics and identifying the components of professionalism, including integrity, initiative, confidentiality, and respect at the work site; Explaining the interdependence and importance of all jobs to the success of an organization; Describing and practicing professional and ethical behaviors; Identifying clothing, grooming, and personal hygiene appropriate for the job; Explaining ways in which on-the-job decisions can affect the quality of work; Describing job-related stress and strategies to manage stress; Explaining employers' and employees' rights and responsibilities; and Determining ways to maintain competency within the industry.
2.2 2.3 2.4 2.5 2.6 2.7 2.8
Standard 3
Workforce and Organizational Management Students will understand workforce and organizational management, including the roles and responsibilities of management and employees.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 3.1 Describing the outcomes of effective management, such as profitability, productivity, employment atmosphere, consumer and client satisfaction, and business growth; Explaining workforce management strategies, such as shared responsibilities, negotiation, planning, and decision making; Using effective workforce management strategies; Analyzing how workforce management strategies affect employees' actions; Identifying appropriate business procedures for consumer services organizations, such as the use of business plans; spreadsheets for payroll and inventories; and other tools for budgets, recordkeeping, and correspondence with consumers and clients; and Describing the uses of technology in the various segments of the consumer services industry.
3.2 3.3 3.4 3.5
3.6
Consumer Services Career Pathway Standards
75
Standard 4
Operational Procedures and Safety Practices Students will understand operational procedures and safety practices commonly performed in the consumer services industry.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 4.1 4.2 Using the correct technical terms to describe products, procedures, and equipment unique to the consumer services industry; Describing and performing operational procedures related to quality control, maintenance, storage, security, shipping, receiving, billing, and payment as required by the job; Describing procedures for preparing, expediting, and tracking forms needed for requisitioning supplies and materials; Preparing and maintaining records, correspondence, and forms as required by the job; Describing accurately products, procedures, and equipment and recommending the use of equipment and merchandise; Describing the uses of technology in the consumer services industry; Using and storing equipment, tools, and supplies properly; Cleaning and maintaining the work station and equipment as required; Describing types and causes of industry-related accidents;
4.3 4.4 4.5 4.6 4.7 4.8 4.9
4.10 Explaining and demonstrating procedures, such as lifting and handling, to reduce and prevent accidents; 4.11 Describing procedures for handling accidents and emergencies; 4.12 Demonstrating correct procedures for completing and maintaining accurate accident reports and records; and 4.13 Analyzing the purpose and information in the Material Safety Data Sheets (MSDSs).
Standard 5
Laws and Regulations Affecting the Consumer Services Industry Students will understand the laws and regulations that affect providers of consumer services.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 5.1 5.2 5.3 Describing the evolution of consumer protection legislation; Identifying and describing the role of local, state, and national public and private agencies and laws that protect consumers; Explaining employers' and employees' responsibilities and procedural requirements for complying with laws and regulations.
76
Consumer Services Career Pathway Standards
5.4
Explaining how local, state, and federal regulations and laws are enforced by regulatory agencies, including the California Occupational Safety and Health Administration (Cal/OSHA); Identifying and explaining policies and procedures established by the employer; Describing how providers of consumer services comply with laws and regulations; and Explaining local, state, and federal regulatory procedures and requirements for employers and employees in the consumer services industry, including labor relations, personnel policies and procedures, and labor laws.
5.5 5.6 5.7
Standard 6
Consumer Rights and Responsibilities Students will understand consumer rights and responsibilities within the consumer services field.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 6.1 6.2 6.3 6.4 Recommending strategies for consumers to use when exercising their rights and accepting their responsibilities; Distinguishing among various advertising techniques used in marketing; Explaining how individuals can have an impact on the legislative process as it relates to consumer regulations; and Analyzing the impact of consumer protection laws on the cost and quality of goods and services.
Standard 7
Global Influences Students will understand the significance of national and international influences, current events, and diversity within the consumer services field.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 7.1 7.2 7.3 7.4 Identifying national and international issues that affect consumers; Analyzing the influence of different global industries, economies, regulations, and political systems on the consumer services field; Describing how cultural diversity affects consumer services; Evaluating local, state, national, and international agencies, organizations, and media resources that provide current consumer information; and Describing the effects of current technology on the ability of customer service agencies to reach a national and global customer base.
7.5
Consumer Services Career Pathway Standards
77
Standard 8
Customer Relationships Students will understand customer relationships and their impact on the consumer services field.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 8.1 8.2 8.3 8.4 8.5 Providing or recommending products and services to address customers' needs or wants; Applying logical, legal, and expedient solutions to consumers' concerns; Evaluating factors that contribute to quality customer relationships; Explaining how the customer's point of view and suggestions affect management's policy and decision making; Using appropriate, empathetic, and effective communication skills and practices that are sensitive to individual differences and cultural factors when dealing with customers; and Describing how the Internet and new technology improve communication and facilitate business operations.
8.6
Standard 9
Consumer Public Relations Students will understand the skills and techniques needed to prepare advertising, public relations, and informational materials for consumers.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 9.1 9.2 9.3 Identifying and describing consumers' tools for communication; Identifying sources and specific outlets of media, including those that are specific to certain cultures; Using investigative research and journalistic skills to prepare and deliver materials and presentations that consumers will understand, such as videos, press kits, public service announcements, and fact sheets; Preparing press release timelines, agenda schedules, and conference arrangements; Using effective communication skills to represent an organization's perspective; Applying advertising techniques; and Preparing a public relations plan that enhances customer relations and operations of an organization.
9.4 9.5 9.6 9.7
Standard 10 Energy, Environmental, and Resource Management
78
Consumer Services Career Pathway Standards
Students will understand consumer programs provided by energy, environmental, and resource management businesses.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 10.1 Comparing consumer programs, including programs for special needs groups, available in a variety of energy, environmental, and resource management businesses; 10.2 Explaining the costs and benefits of consumer programs for consumers, communities, and businesses; 10.3 Explaining and identifying the sources of energy and energy efficiency; 10.4 Explaining residential and commercial waste disposal and recycling issues; 10.5 Interpreting electric, gas, and water bills and meters for the consumer; 10.6 Developing an energy conservation record for electric, gas, and water meters; and 10.7 Describing methods of reducing, reusing, and recycling waste.
Standard 11 Consumer Product Development, Testing, and Demonstration Students will understand the procedures required to research, test, label, and demonstrate products to provide information needed by employees, consumers, and clients.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 11.1 Identifying trends that affect the customer's demand for products and services; 11.2 Comparing features, benefits, prices, product information, styles, and performance of consumer goods and analyzing the relationships among them; 11.3 Comparing products sold through the Internet; 11.4 Describing the purpose of marketing research before a new product or service is developed and introduced; 11.5 Following standard testing procedures, analyzing data, and integrating findings to revise products; 11.6 Preparing information labels and instructions for care according to industry standards and governmental regulations; and 11.7 Planning, conducting, and evaluating demonstrations that educate consumers and promote a variety of products.
Consumer Services Career Pathway Standards
79
Standard 12 Financial Management Students will understand the impact of the U.S. economic system on personal income, financial management, individual and family security, and consumer decisions.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 12.1 Explaining the interrelationship between the economy and consumer spending; 12.2 Describing services provided by various financial institutions; 12.3 Developing short-term and long-term financial plans that reflect needs, wants, values, goals, and economic situations; 12.4 Analyzing how short-term and long-term financial plans affect consumer decisions; 12.5 Providing information related to credit terminology, credit ratings and sources, and costs of credit; 12.6 Evaluating the costs, risks, and benefits of consumer credit; 12.7 Explaining the costs of bankruptcy to the individual, the institution, and the economy; 12.8 Preparing plans to resolve credit issues and explaining the effect of those issues on the consumer; and 12.9 Analyzing various types of investments and risk-management programs.
Standard 13 Personal, Interpersonal, and Communication Skills Students will understand how personal, interpersonal, and communication skills influence employability.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 13.1 Describing interpersonal skills that enhance relationships at the work site, such as working cooperatively, communicating effectively, sharing responsibilities, and exercising leadership; 13.2 Analyzing the importance of such personal skills as a positive attitude, self-confidence, honesty, integrity, and self-discipline as these characteristics pertain to work, personal, and family life; 13.3 Explaining ways in which to resolve conflicts, use negotiation skills, and communicate resolutions across gender, age, and cultural groups; 13.4 Assessing the importance of effective nonverbal, oral, and written communication skills in getting and keeping a job; 13.5 Using appropriate communication skills, including correct telephone, facsimile, and e-mail etiquette; and 13.6 Interpreting nonverbal communication and responding appropriately.
80
Consumer Services Career Pathway Standards
Standard 14 Thinking and Problem-Solving Skills Students will exhibit critical and creative thinking, logical reasoning, and problem-solving skills.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 14.1 Identifying issues and problems in the consumer services industry and offering possible solutions; 14.2 Considering multiple options for completing work tasks and applying appropriate problem-solving strategies to work-related issues; and 14.3 Applying creative thinking skills to identify and present new ways to perform work effectively.
Standard 15 Balancing Personal, Family, and Work Responsibilities Students will understand management strategies needed to achieve balance in work, personal, and family life.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 15.1 Identifying and analyzing multiple roles as members of the workforce, families, and communities; 15.2 Identifying and analyzing resources that help in managing the responsibilities of multiple roles; 15.3 Identifying and applying management strategies to achieve balance in work and family roles; and 15.4 Evaluating effectiveness in balancing responsibilities at home and work.
Standard 16 Teamwork and Leadership Students will understand the teamwork and leadership concepts and skills needed to succeed in work, personal, family, and community life.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 16.1 Identifying, comparing, and analyzing the characteristics and benefits of teamwork, leadership, and citizenship in the workplace and community; 16.2 Defining leadership roles in work and community life; 16.3 Identifying and practicing strategies for effective teamwork, leadership, and citizenship in the workplace and community; 16.4 Developing skills in teamwork, leadership, and citizenship by participating in FHA-HERO activities; 16.5 Analyzing and using written and professional resources that help in developing skills in teamwork and leadership; and 16.6 Assessing how skills in teamwork and leadership enhance employability.
Consumer Services Career Pathway Standards
81
Home Economics Related Occupations
Family and Human Services
82
Over view of Family and Human Services
Working to help people live more comfortably, solve problems successfully, and resolve conflicts more equitably can be a personally rewarding career.
Social service aide and technician, eligibility worker, family counselor, adult day care worker, personal/home care aide, and recreation worker are only a few of the career opportunities awaiting qualified individuals in family and human services.
Family and Human Services Program Courses in a Home Economics Related Occupations (HERO) program, funded by a school district or regional occupational center program (ROCP), enable students to develop the knowledge, skills, attitudes, and behaviors necessary to succeed in the family and human services industry.
The course of study includes awareness of the industry; professional behavior and standards; workforce and organizational management; facility management; laws and regulations affecting service providers and their clients; safety, emergency, and disaster procedures; nutrition and health; human developmental needs; consumer assistance; daily living activities; interaction with families and communities; behavior management and positive guidance; social involvement; problems and crises of individuals and families; and needs of the elderly.
Students also study employment and management skills for careers in family and social services and elder care services.
Emphasis is placed on helping the elderly and families in home and community settings.
FHA-HERO, a pre-professional organization for students, provides cocurricular leadership and career development opportunities in HERO instructional programs.
Effective programs incorporate FHA-HERO as a teaching strategy for developing interpersonal, leadership, citizenship, and career skills.
This HERO program serves as the capstone course in the secondary-level Home Economics Careers and Technology Family and Human Services career pathway sequence.
The program continues a course sequence that includes a Consumer and Family Studies Comprehensive Core and a specialized content area course in family relations and parenthood.
The shaded portion of Chart 5.1, "Family and Human Services Career Pathway Options," illustrates a sample course sequence for Family and Human
Chart 5.1
Family and Human Services Career Pathway Options Home Economics Related Occupations (HERO) Grades 11 and 12 HERO: District- or ROCP-Funded Programs Introduction to Teaching Careers (Optional) Careers in Education Careers in Child Development
Consumer and Family Studies (CFS) Grades 10, 11, and 12 CFS Specialized Courses
Grades 6­10 CFS Foundation Courses Child Development and Guidance Grades 9 and 10 CFS Core Courses
Consumer Education Life Management I* Economics for Living
Careers in Consumer Services
Community College Careers in Family and Human Services Four-Year College or University
Middle Grades Exploratory CFS Courses
Family Living and Parenting Education Life Management II* Fashion, Textiles, and Apparel Introduction to Fashion Careers (Optional)
Exploratory Home Economics Careers and Technology (Grades 6 and 7)
Careers in Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising Employment
Teen Living (Grade 8) Grades 10, 11, and 12 CFS Specialized Course
Nutritional Science
Careers in Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition Apprenticeship Careers in Food Service and Hospitality
Parenting and Personal Relationships (Grades 7 and 8)
Individual and Family Health** Food and Nutrition *Focuses on managing work and family.
These courses are recommended for all career pathways.
**May be offered as part of several career pathways.
Introduction to Hospitality Careers (Optional) Careers in Hospitality, Tourism, and Recreation
Private Postsecondary Programs/Training
FHA-HERO leadership and career development are integral to the instructional program for grades 6­12.
Housing and Furnishings Environmental Design
Careers in Interior Design, Furnishings, and Maintenance
83
84
Family and Human Services
Services.
The appendix, "Overview of HECT Course Sequences, Grades Nine Through Twelve," provides additional information about the design of course sequences.
Characteristics and Use of the Content Standards The HERO Family and Human Services content standards build on the knowledge, skills, attitudes, and behaviors outlined in the Consumer and Family Studies family living and parenting education, consumer education, and food and nutrition content standards.
Employability and FHA-HERO leadership skills are integrated into the standards.
These standards are intended for use by secondary-level instructors and administrators to strengthen curriculum, instruction, and assessment.
Secondary-level instructors will also use these standards in collaborating with postsecondary instructors to articulate and sequence instruction, thereby eliminating unnecessary duplication of content at both levels of education.
See also the section "Use of the Content Standards," described in "Overview of Home Economics Careers and Technology Programs," at the beginning of this document.
The standards delineated in this section reflect content identified by representatives of the profession and by instructors of secondary and postsecondary courses in Family and Human Services programs.
Each content standard contains the following components: Title of the standard: The title of each standard identifies the concept addressed in the content.
Statement of the standard: Each standard addresses broadly what a student should know.
Benchmarks: Statements listed below each standard describe what students should be able to do to meet the broad standard.
Technical assistance and resources for implementing standards-based Home Economics Careers and Technology course sequences and programs in Family and Human Services are available from the Home Economics Careers and Technology Unit, Standards and High School Development Division, California Department of Education.
85
Family and Human Ser vices Career Pathway Standards
Listed below are the career pathway standards for the family and human services industry.
Standard 1
Family and Human Services Industry Awareness Students will understand the breadth of the family and human services industry, including career opportunities and the role of this industry in local and state economies.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 1.1 1.2 Defining the terminology unique to the family and human services industry; Identifying family and human services industries, the role of these industries for individuals and families, and contributions to local and state economies; Conducting research of legislative and economic trends affecting family and human services organizations and industries; Investigating careers related to the industry and the requirements for education or training; Describing career paths and strategies for obtaining employment and advancing in the family and human services industry; Assessing the personal qualifications, interests, aptitudes, knowledge, and skills necessary to succeed in family and human services careers; Explaining the emotional, physical, legal, and economic aspects of accessibility for consumers and clients with disabilities; Illustrating an organizational structure and hierarchy, including the relationships and interactions among departments in both the public and private sectors; Describing ways in which written and unwritten policies and procedures affect the daily operations of an organization; and
1.3 1.4 1.5 1.6
1.7 1.8
1.9
1.10 Identifying the knowledge, skills, aptitudes, and behaviors that can be transferred to higher levels of employment within the career pathway or to other fields.
86
Family and Human Services Career Pathway Standards
Standard 2
Professional Standards/ Dignity of Work Students will understand what constitutes professional behavior, image, and standards.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 2.1 Describing a code of ethics and identifying the components of professionalism, including integrity, initiative, confidentiality, and respect at the work site; Explaining the interdependence and importance of all jobs to the success of an organization; Describing and practicing professional and ethical behaviors; Identifying clothing, grooming, and personal hygiene appropriate for the job; Explaining ways in which on-the-job decisions can affect the quality of work; Describing job-related stress and strategies to manage stress; Explaining employers' and employees' rights and responsibilities; and Determining ways to maintain competency within the industry.
2.2 2.3 2.4 2.5 2.6 2.7 2.8
Standard 3
Workforce and Organizational Management Students will understand workforce and organizational management, including the roles and responsibilities of management and employees.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 3.1 Describing the outcomes of effective management, such as profitability, productivity, employment atmosphere, consumer and client satisfaction, and business growth; Explaining workforce management strategies, such as shared responsibilities, negotiation, planning, and decision making; Using effective workforce management strategies; Analyzing how workforce management strategies affect employees' actions; Identifying appropriate business procedures for family and human services organizations, such as the use of business plans; spreadsheets for payroll and inventories; and other tools for budgets, recordkeeping, and correspondence with consumers and clients; Describing the uses of technology in various segments in the family and human services industry; and Describing various sources of funding for nonprofit family and human services organizations.
3.2 3.3 3.4 3.5
3.6 3.7
Family and Human Services Career Pathway Standards
87
Standard 4
Facility Management and Operational Procedures Students will understand the management practices and operational procedures commonly performed in family and human services facilities.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 4.1 Describing a facility that promotes the independence of consumers and clients, such as one that provides handrails, wheelchair ramps, and lowered countertops; Evaluating the facility for the safety and well-being of the consumers and clients; Identifying and developing tasks and skills necessary to maintain a clean, safe, orderly, and functional environment; Using procedures to clean a facility that follow a logical sequence and recommending materials and equipment needed; Describing and performing operational procedures related to quality control, inventory control, maintenance, storage, security, shipping, receiving, billing, and payment as required by the job; Preparing and maintaining records, correspondence, and forms as required by the job; and Describing various types of liability, insurance policies, code compliance, service agreements, and contracts.
4.2 4.3 4.4 4.5
4.6 4.7
Standard 5
Laws and Regulations Affecting the Family and Human Ser vices Industry Students will understand the laws and regulations that affect providers of family and human services and their clients.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 5.1 5.2 Describing and complying with the laws and regulations affecting the family and human services industry; Identifying local, state, and federal laws, regulations, and agencies established to protect children, adolescents, and adults, including the elderly and others with special needs; Explaining employers' and employees' responsibilities and procedural requirements for complying with laws and regulations; Explaining how local, state, and federal regulations and laws are enforced by regulatory agencies, including the California Occupational Safety and Health Administration (Cal/OSHA); Identifying and explaining policies and procedures established by the employer;
5.3 5.4
5.5
88
Family and Human Services Career Pathway Standards
5.6
Complying with laws and regulations affecting the needs, interests, and rights of children, adolescents, and adults, including the elderly and individuals with special needs; and Explaining local, state, and federal regulatory procedures and requirements for employers and employees in the family and human services industry, including labor relations, personnel policies and procedures, and labor laws.
5.7
Standard 6
Safety, Emergency, and Disaster Procedures Students will understand safety, emergency, and disaster procedures.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 6.1 Comparing state and federal environmental and safety regulations, including those for the California Occupational Safety and Health Administration (Cal/OSHA), as they relate to the family and human services industry; Explaining ways to establish, maintain, and promote good safety habits for all ages; Describing and using safe work habits; Performing basic first aid and cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR); Using equipment, tools, and supplies properly; Describing common accidents at the work site and recommending safety procedures, including lifting and handling, to reduce and prevent accidents; Determining appropriate procedures and recommending equipment for handling accidents, emergencies, and disasters; Using correct procedures for completing accident reports and records; Practicing procedures for preventing the spread of illness, including blood-borne pathogens; and
6.2 6.3 6.4 6.5 6.6
6.7 6.8 6.9
6.10 Analyzing the purpose of and information in the Material Safety Data Sheets (MSDSs).
Standard 7
Nutrition and Health Students will understand the basic principles of health, nutrition, and food preparation, handling, and storage.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 7.1 Explaining ways to establish, maintain, and promote good health for all ages;
Family and Human Services Career Pathway Standards
89
7.2 7.3 7.4 7.5 7.6 7.7 7.8 7.9
Describing the basic food groups, including those on the Food Guide Pyramid; Describing basic dietary needs of individuals and the relationship of those needs to physical and emotional well-being; Planning, preparing, and serving nutritional snacks and meals; Selecting and purchasing foods that are of high nutritional value and are economical; Demonstrating sanitation and food handling procedures, including the transportation and storage of food; Planning menus for special dietary needs; Evaluating foods for nutritional value, visual appeal, flavor, and texture; and Recognizing and describing signs and symptoms of illness and discomfort.
Standard 8
Human Developmental Needs Students will understand the stages of human development throughout the life span and the related needs of individuals and families.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 8.1 8.2 8.3 8.4 8.5 8.6 Describing and comparing the characteristics and changing needs of the various stages of development throughout the life span; Describing and assessing the needs, problems, and adjustments of individuals and families to life changes; Identifying behaviors and resources that foster the well-being of individuals and families; Determining ways to enhance the emotional health of individuals and families throughout the life span; Describing the importance of socialization throughout the life span; Determining the needs of special populations, including, but not limited to, those with learning disabilities, behavioral problems, and physical limitations; and Identifying and comparing resources and agencies that provide a variety of services for individuals and families with special needs.
8.7
Standard 9
Consumer Assistance Students will understand ways to help individuals and families in making consumer decisions that lead to self-sufficiency.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by:
90
Family and Human Services Career Pathway Standards
9.1 9.2 9.3 9.4 9.5 9.6
Providing examples of consumers and clients needing assistance in consumer decision making; Helping individuals and families in identifying resources for shopping, banking, recordkeeping, and other consumer services; Informing individuals and families of their rights and responsibilities as consumers; Explaining consumer practices, such as doing comparison shopping, reading labels, and interpreting warranties and guarantees; Helping consumers and clients to develop effective purchasing skills; and Evaluating community resources and referral services, including transportation and housing.
Standard 10 Daily Living Activities Students will understand the daily living activities of individuals and families.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 10.1 Explaining the importance of personal care and well-being to consumers' and clients' physical and emotional health; 10.2 Determining the appropriate assistance that individuals need, throughout the life span, with the activities of daily living, including physical fitness, medication and health management, hygiene, grooming, and dressing; 10.3 Describing how to maintain privacy, independence, dignity, and respect for consumers and clients; 10.4 Helping consumers and clients with hygiene and personal care, including dressing and grooming; 10.5 Analyzing tasks required to satisfy the personal care needs of consumers and clients; 10.6 Planning exercise activities that are enjoyable, safe, and appropriate for the individual needs of consumers and clients; 10.7 Helping consumers and clients with special needs, such as with the use of prosthetics and other therapeutic equipment; 10.8 Describing various types of disabilities, potential barriers, and types of accommodations needed for consumers and clients; and 10.9 Investigating technologically advanced equipment designed to meet the needs of the consumers and clients.
Family and Human Services Career Pathway Standards
91
Standard 11 Interaction with Families and Communities Students will understand skills required to interact effectively with families and communities.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 11.1 Describing and using effective interaction skills, appropriately and with sensitivity, when dealing with consumers, clients, and their families; 11.2 Identifying resources that promote interaction between the consumers and clients, their families, and the community; 11.3 Describing ways to communicate and interact with culturally diverse families and their communities; 11.4 Investigating effective ways to enhance communication and interaction among members of families and the community; 11.5 Describing ways to show sensitivity to cultural and individual family differences; 11.6 Using conflict resolution and mediation skills that enhance interaction with family members and the community; and 11.7 Assessing the contributions of family members and the community to the well-being of the consumers and clients.
Standard 12 Behavior Management and Positive Guidance Students will understand positive guidance and its application in helping individuals and families.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 12.1 Describing positive guidance and its benefits; 12.2 Explaining and analyzing types of positive guidance techniques that are appropriate for the consumers and clients; 12.3 Identifying possible causes of behavior problems and suggesting solutions; and 12.4 Identifying responsible actions that promote independence for consumers and clients.
Standard 13 Social Involvement Students will understand the importance of social involvement for individuals and families.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 13.1 Explaining the value of social, recreational, and educational activities across the life span; 13.2 Planning, conducting, and evaluating social, recreational, and educational activities appropriate to the physical, psychological, cultural, and socioeconomic needs of individuals and families;
92
Family and Human Services Career Pathway Standards
13.3 Identifying and recommending community resources for social, recreational, and educational activities to meet consumers' and clients' needs; 13.4 Evaluating facilities and community resources available for social, recreational, and educational activities; and 13.5 Describing activities that promote interaction between consumers and clients and their families.
Standard 14 Problems and Crises of Individuals and Families Students will understand problems and crises affecting individuals and families.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 14.1 Identifying emotional and substance abuse problems that affect individuals and families; 14.2 Identifying signs of emotional crises and mental health issues; 14.3 Describing symptoms associated with depression, isolation, substance abuse, and stress; 14.4 Responding to consumers and clients in a sensitive, professional manner; 14.5 Investigating behavior modification techniques that address disruptive behaviors; 14.6 Recognizing behaviors that require intervention and outside assistance; and 14.7 Describing the information families need to make decisions about the options in caring for a family member.
Standard 15 Needs of the Elderly The student will understand characteristics and needs of the elderly.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 15.1 Defining physical and mental fitness for elderly consumers and clients; 15.2 Describing the benefits of maintaining physical and mental fitness for elderly consumers and clients; 15.3 Examining, planning, and conducting activities for the elderly that contribute to their physical and mental fitness and well-being; 15.4 Identifying symptoms associated with depression, substance abuse, confusion, dementia, and isolation in elderly consumers and clients;
Family and Human Services Career Pathway Standards
93
15.5 Investigating behavior modification techniques that address aggressive or inappropriate behavior; and 15.6 Evaluating behaviors that suggest intervention and outside assistance.
Standard 16 Personal, Interpersonal, and Communication Skills Students will understand how personal, interpersonal, and communication skills influence employability.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 16.1 Describing interpersonal skills that enhance relationships at the work site, such as working cooperatively, communicating effectively, sharing responsibilities, and exercising leadership; 16.2 Analyzing the importance of such personal skills as a positive attitude, self-confidence, honesty, integrity, and self-discipline as these characteristics pertain to work, personal, and family life; 16.3 Explaining ways in which to resolve conflicts, use negotiation skills, and communicate resolutions across gender, age, and cultural groups; 16.4 Assessing the importance of effective nonverbal, oral, and written communication skills in getting and keeping a job; 16.5 Using appropriate communication skills, including correct telephone, facsimile, and e-mail etiquette; and 16.6 Interpreting nonverbal communication and responding appropriately.
Standard 17 Thinking and Problem-Solving Skills Students will exhibit critical and creative thinking, logical reasoning, and problem-solving skills.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 17.1 Identifying issues and problems in the family and human services industry and offering possible solutions; 17.2 Considering multiple options for completing work tasks and applying appropriate problem-solving strategies to work-related issues; and 17.3 Applying creative thinking skills to identify and present new ways to perform work effectively.
Standard 18 Balancing Personal, Family, and Work Responsibilities Students will understand management strategies needed to achieve balance in work, personal, and family life.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 18.1 Identifying and analyzing multiple roles as members of the workforce, families, and communities;
94
Family and Human Services Career Pathway Standards
18.2 Identifying and analyzing resources that help in managing the responsibilities of multiple roles; 18.3 Identifying and applying management strategies needed to achieve balance in work and family roles; and 18.4 Evaluating effectiveness in balancing responsibilities at home and work.
Standard 19 Teamwork and Leadership Students will understand the teamwork and leadership concepts and skills needed to succeed in work, personal, family, and community life.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 19.1 Identifying, comparing, and analyzing the characteristics and benefits of teamwork, leadership, and citizenship in the workplace and community; 19.2 Defining leadership roles in work and community life; 19.3 Identifying and practicing strategies for effective teamwork, leadership, and citizenship in the workplace and community; 19.4 Developing skills in teamwork, leadership, and citizenship by participating in FHA-HERO activities; 19.5 Analyzing and using written and professional resources that help in developing skills in teamwork and leadership; and 19.6 Assessing how skills in teamwork and leadership enhance employability.
Family and Human Services Career Pathway Standards
95
Home Economics Related Occupations
Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising
96
Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising
Overview of Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising
California has long been considered one of the world's main fashion centers.
In fact, the fashion and apparel industry has emerged as one of California's leading employers, with the state ranking number one in the nation as a wholesale and retail fashion center.
Few careers offer the creativity and versatility of the fashion world or its fascinating history.
From garment worker to fashion artist, every worker plays an important role in building and cementing California's extraordinary position as a fashion capital.
Career opportunities in Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising include fashion designer, custom tailor, manufacturer's representative, fashion buyer, personal wardrobe consultant, textile technician, fashion illustrator, and fashion merchandising manager.
Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising Program Courses in the Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising career pathway cluster establish a foundation in all aspects of the fashion industry.
Courses in a Home Economics Related Occupations (HERO) program, funded by a school district or regional occupational center program (ROCP), enable students to develop the knowledge, skills, attitudes, and behaviors necessary to succeed in this industry.
Students pursuing this career pathway study the industry, professional standards/dignity of work, workforce and organizational management, operational procedures and safety practices, laws and regulations, design elements and principles, history of fashion, fashion forecasting, textiles and textile products, garment construction in manufacturing, product knowledge and apparel merchandising, sales and service, visual merchandising, inventory control and loss prevention, pattern making for apparel design, developing and merchandising a line, textile design, garment alteration and repair, and care and cleaning of apparel.
Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising students also learn employment and management skills.
FHA-HERO, a pre-professional organization for students, provides cocurricular leadership and career development opportunities in HERO instructional programs.
Effective programs incorporate FHA-HERO as a teaching strategy for developing interpersonal, leadership, citizenship, and career skills.
Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising
97
This HERO program serves as the capstone course in the secondary-level Home Economics Careers and Technology Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising career pathway sequence.
The program continues a course sequence that includes a Consumer and Family Studies Comprehensive Core and a specialized content area course in fashion, textiles, and apparel.
The shaded portion of Chart 6.1, "Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising Career Pathway Options," illustrates a sample course sequence for Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising.
The appendix, "Overview of HECT Course Sequences, Grades Nine Through Twelve," provides additional information about the design of course sequences.
Characteristics and Use of the Content Standards The HERO Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising content standards build on the knowledge, skills, attitudes, and behaviors outlined in the Consumer and Family Studies fashion, textiles, and apparel content standards.
Employability and FHA-HERO leadership skills are integrated into the standards.
These standards are intended for use by secondary-level instructors and administrators to strengthen curriculum, instruction, and assessment.
Secondary-level instructors will also use these standards in collaborating with postsecondary instructors to articulate and sequence instruction, thereby eliminating unnecessary duplication of content at both levels of education.
See also the section "Use of the Content Standards," described in "Overview of Home Economics Careers and Technology Programs," at the beginning of this document.
The standards delineated in this section reflect content identified by representatives of the industry and by instructors of secondary and postsecondary courses in Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising programs.
Each content standard contains the following components: Title of the standard: The title of each standard identifies the concept addressed in the content.
Statement of the standard: Each standard addresses broadly what a student should know.
Benchmarks: Statements listed below each standard describe what students should be able to do to meet the broad standard.
Technical assistance and resources for implementing standards-based Home Economics Careers and Technology course sequences and programs in Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising are available from the Home Economics Careers and Technology Unit, Standards and High School Development Division, California Department of Education.
98
Chart 6.1
Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising Career Pathway Options Home Economics Related Occupations (HERO) Grades 11 and 12 HERO: District- or ROCP-Funded Programs Introduction to Teaching Careers (Optional) Careers in Education Careers in Child Development
Consumer and Family Studies (CFS) Grades 10, 11, and 12 CFS Specialized Courses
Grades 6­10 CFS Foundation Courses Child Development and Guidance Grades 9 and 10 CFS Core Courses
Consumer Education Life Management I* Economics for Living
Careers in Consumer Services
Community College
Middle Grades Exploratory CFS Courses
Family Living and Parenting Education Life Management II* Fashion, Textiles, and Apparel Introduction to Fashion Careers (Optional)
Careers in Family and Human Services Four-Year College or University Careers in Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising Employment
Exploratory Home Economics Careers and Technology (Grades 6 and 7)
Teen Living (Grade 8) Grades 10, 11, and 12 CFS Specialized Course
Nutritional Science
Careers in Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition Apprenticeship Careers in Food Service and Hospitality
Parenting and Personal Relationships (Grades 7 and 8) Food and Nutrition *Focuses on managing work and family.
These courses are recommended for all career pathways.
**May be offered as part of several career pathways.
Individual and Family Health**
Introduction to Hospitality Careers (Optional) Careers in Hospitality, Tourism, and Recreation
Private Postsecondary Programs/Training
FHA-HERO leadership and career development are integral to the instructional program for grades 6­12.
Housing and Furnishings Environmental Design
Careers in Interior Design, Furnishings, and Maintenance
99
Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising Career Pathway Standards
Listed below are the career pathway standards for the fashion design, manufacturing, and merchandising industry.
Standard 1
Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising Industr y Awareness Students will understand the breadth of the fashion design, manufacturing, and merchandising industry, including career opportunities and the role of this industry in state and local economies.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 1.1 1.2 1.3 Identifying the various career opportunities within segments of the fashion design, manufacturing, and merchandising industry; Investigating careers related to the industry and the requirements for education or training; Assessing the personal qualifications, interests, aptitudes, knowledge, and skills necessary to succeed in fashion design, manufacturing, and merchandising careers; Describing career paths and strategies for obtaining employment and advancing in the fashion design, manufacturing, and merchandising industry; Describing the roles and functions of the various segments of the fashion design, manufacturing, and merchandising industry; Determining the economic contributions of the various segments of the fashion design, manufacturing, and merchandising industry to local, state, and global economies; Illustrating an organizational structure and hierarchy, including the relationships and interactions among departments in both the public and private sectors; Analyzing economic trends in the various segments of the fashion design, manufacturing, and merchandising industry and comparing those trends with state and national economic trends; Identifying ways in which apparel-related resources, such as periodicals, mass media, and the Internet are used in the fashion design, manufacturing, and merchandising industry; and
1.4
1.5 1.6
1.7
1.8
1.9
100
Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising
1.10 Identifying the knowledge, skills, aptitudes, and behaviors that can be transferred to higher levels of employment within the career pathway or to other fields.
Standard 2
Professional Standards/ Dignity of Work Students will understand what constitutes professional behavior, image, and standards.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 2.1 Describing a code of ethics and identifying the components of professionalism, including integrity, initiative, confidentiality, and respect at the work site; Explaining the interdependence and importance of all jobs to the success of an organization; Describing and practicing professional and ethical behaviors; Identifying clothing, grooming, and personal hygiene appropriate for the job; Explaining ways in which on-the-job decisions can affect the quality of work; Describing job-related stress and strategies to manage stress; Explaining employers' and employees' rights and responsibilities; and Determining ways to maintain competency within the industry.
2.2 2.3 2.4 2.5 2.6 2.7 2.8
Standard 3
Workforce and Organizational Management Students will understand workforce and organizational management, including the roles and responsibilities of management and employees.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 3.1 Describing the outcomes of effective management, such as profitability, productivity, employment atmosphere, consumer and client satisfaction, and business growth; Explaining workforce management strategies, such as shared responsibilities, negotiation, planning, and decision making; Using effective workforce management strategies; Analyzing how workforce management strategies affect employees' actions; and Identifying appropriate business procedures for fashion design, manufacturing, and merchandising organizations, such as the use of business plans; spreadsheets for payroll and inventories; and other tools for budgets, recordkeeping, and correspondence with clients.
Describing the uses of technology in the various segments of the fashion design, manufacturing, and merchandising industry.
3.2 3.3 3.4 3.5
3.6
Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising
101
Standard 4
Operational Procedures and Safety Practices Students will understand operational procedures and safety practices commonly performed in the fashion design, manufacturing, and merchandising industry.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 4.1 Describing and performing operational procedures related to quality control, inventory control, maintenance, storage, security, shipping, receiving, billing, and payment as required by the job; Explaining factors affecting profit, such as operational costs, markup, and markdown; Describing procedures for preparing, expediting, and tracking forms needed for requisitioning supplies and materials; Preparing and maintaining records, correspondence, and forms as required by the job; Using correct technical terms to describe products, procedures, and equipment commonly used in the apparel and textile industries; Describing the uses of technology in the fashion design, manufacturing, and merchandising industry; Using equipment, tools, and supplies properly; Cleaning and maintaining the work station and equipment as required; Describing types and causes of industry-related accidents;
4.2 4.3 4.4 4.5 4.6 4.7 4.8 4.9
4.10 Explaining and demonstrating procedures, such as lifting and handling, to reduce and prevent accidents; 4.11 Describing procedures for handling accidents and emergencies; 4.12 Demonstrating correct procedures for completing and maintaining accurate accident reports and records; and 4.13 Analyzing the purpose of and information in the Material Safety Data Sheets (MSDSs).
Standard 5
Laws and Regulations Affecting the Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising Industry Students will understand the laws and regulations that affect providers of services in the fashion design, manufacturing, and merchandising industry and their clients.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 5.1 Describing and complying with the laws and regulations affecting the fashion design, manufacturing, and merchandising industry;
102
Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising
5.2
Identifying local, state, and federal laws, regulations, and agencies established to protect employees, employers, customers, and others with special needs; Explaining employers' and employees' responsibilities and procedural requirements for complying with laws and regulations; Explaining how local, state, and federal regulations and laws are enforced by regulatory agencies, including the California Occupational Safety and Health Administration (Cal/OSHA); and Identifying and explaining policies and procedures established by the employer.
5.3 5.4
5.5
Standard 6
Design Elements and Principles Students will understand the elements and principles of design.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 6.1 6.2 6.3 Describing the elements and principles of design and relating them to the industry; Applying the elements and principles of design to designing, marketing, and merchandising; and Relating the application of elements and principles of design to environmental, sociological, ecological, psychological, technical, and economic issues and trends.
Standard 7
History of Fashion Students will understand the historical aspects and trends of fashion and their relationship to changing economic, social, and cultural conditions.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 7.1 7.2 7.3 7.4 Describing fashion trends in various periods throughout history; Analyzing how fashion, at a particular period in history, was influenced by politics, society, economics, cultures, and aesthetics; Tracing the development of various fashion designs throughout history; and Analyzing the ways in which prosperity, mass production, labor unions, and technology affect the fashion industry.
Standard 8
Fashion Forecasting Students will understand merchandising and forecasting as used in the fashion design, manufacturing, and merchandising industry.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by:
Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising
103
8.1 8.2 8.3 8.4 8.5
Identifying and describing resources available to the fashion industry that provide information on fashion trends and color forecasting; Investigating and researching fashion trends; Collecting and analyzing information from fashion forecasting resources; Investigating retail stores to determine fashion trends; and Identifying and evaluating information on trends and forecasting for the target customer.
Standard 9 Textiles and Textile Products Students will understand the characteristics and maintenance of textiles and textile products.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 9.1 9.2 9.3 Identifying and describing the general characteristics of fibers, yarns, fabrics, and finishes; Identifying and describing textile manufacturing methods for producing such fabrics as woven, nonwoven, and knits; Identifying and describing standard types of print design, such as abstract and geometric, and color designs, including tone-on-tone, positive/negative, and monotone; Relating textile characteristics to garment design, construction, care, and maintenance; Identifying and describing methods of color application to yarns, textiles, and garments; and Identifying appropriate maintenance procedures needed for various fabrics.
9.4 9.5 9.6
Standard 10 Garment Construction in Manufacturing Students will understand garment construction skills used in a variety of occupations within the fashion manufacturing and merchandising industry.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 10.1 Describing the process of manufacturing garments; 10.2 Operating commercial sewing machines and attachments and using a variety of equipment, tools, and supplies to construct or manufacture garments; and 10.3 Examining and explaining the use of computers, related software, and other technology in the apparel manufacturing industry.
104
Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising
Standard 11 Product Knowledge and Apparel Merchandising Students will understand the merchandising of apparel products.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 11.1 Identifying and describing categories of apparel merchandise; 11.2 Describing the characteristics of different types of retailers and the merchandise sold by each; 11.3 Interpreting information from product labels; 11.4 Identifying size ranges of merchandise by product category; 11.5 Describing the factors that influence merchandise selection for specific markets; 11.6 Analyzing marketing and merchandising techniques that create a specific image for a particular merchandise category; 11.7 Analyzing the similarities and differences of merchandise from different countries; and 11.8 Comparing and evaluating trade publications and reports available to the retail and manufacturing communities.
Standard 12 Sales and Service Students will understand the skills and procedures necessary to help retail clients in making decisions and purchases.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 12.1 Collecting information about customers through customer interviews and developing and maintaining client files; 12.2 Describing sources of information for successful sales, such as client files, product information, catalogues, and price lists; 12.3 Describing and evaluating factors that contribute to quality customer relations, including greeting practices; 12.4 Evaluating the impact of cultural factors on customer needs, wants, and satisfaction; 12.5 Analyzing sales techniques for their effectiveness; 12.6 Organizing, maintaining, and accessing information to enhance product knowledge; 12.7 Informing customers of special services, sales, and promotions; 12.8 Helping customers in selecting merchandise appropriate to their needs, budget, personality, figure type, coloring, and personal preference; 12.9 Recommending accessories and other related merchandise and services to customers;
Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising
105
12.10 Describing procedures to make change, process checks, and complete credit card transactions; 12.11 Assessing procedures for sales, exchanges, and returns; 12.12 Describing procedures for balancing cash drawers and cash control; and 12.13 Resolving problems related to cash transactions.
Standard 13 Visual Merchandising Students will understand the procedures necessary to produce and maintain interior and exterior store displays.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 13.1 Describing the characteristics of interior and exterior displays that attract customers; 13.2 Identifying and evaluating store displays for intended messages, such as a store's image, a specific manufacturer's label, a color or fabric story, or a specific event; 13.3 Explaining how to arrange merchandise on various fixtures; 13.4 Describing the procedures for determining the placement of merchandise on the sales floor; and 13.5 Creating displays using mannequins, shadow boxes, wall and tabletop displays, props, signage, and appropriate lighting.
Standard 14 Inventor y Control and Loss Prevention Students will understand the current laws and work site policies and procedures regarding inventory control and loss prevention.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 14.1 Explaining the procedures involved with receiving, inspecting, marking, and distributing merchandise to the selling floor; 14.2 Describing interstore transfers and general distribution of goods; 14.3 Explaining the current laws regarding security problems that affect inventories; 14.4 Recognizing where inventory losses occur and recommending strategies for loss prevention; and 14.5 Analyzing how loss prevention affects store profits.
Standard 15 Pattern Making for Apparel Design Students will understand the procedures of draping and pattern making to produce a pattern for apparel design.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by:
106
Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising
15.1 Constructing the basic bodice by flat pattern or draping techniques to fit a standard dress form; 15.2 Distributing fullness on the basic bodice through dart manipulations and different pattern designs; 15.3 Constructing patterns using the knowledge and skills needed for a variety of garments; 15.4 Fitting the standard dress form through pinning and marking fabric, transferring marked fabric to paper, and adjusting for accuracy; 15.5 Constructing and evaluating sample garments from first patterns; and 15.6 Using various fabrics to assess draping qualities.
Standard 16 Developing and Merchandising a Line Students will understand the procedures commonly performed to develop and merchandise a line.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 16.1 Identifying and explaining procedures for planning a line; 16.2 Determining decisions required in the planning stage of developing a line; 16.3 Using basic sketching techniques to create designs; 16.4 Applying the use of color on garment sketches; 16.5 Preparing sketches, color plates, and presentation boards; 16.6 Creating paper patterns from design sketches and choosing the appropriate fabrics, trims, colors, and styling themes; 16.7 Preparing garment specification sheets, including all fabrics, trims, and findings; 16.8 Relating the manufacturing process to the cost of producing a garment; 16.9 Identifying and explaining the formulas and procedures for costing a garment, including manufacturers' costs, markup, and profit margin; 16.10 Preparing cost sheets for garments; 16.11 Identifying and explaining various pattern-grading techniques applied to a variety of clothing and component pieces; 16.12 Making markers to increase profits by minimizing fabric use; and 16.13 Using computer-assisted drafting programs in apparel design.
Standard 17 Textile Design Students will understand the skills and procedures necessary to create and produce textile designs.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by:
Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising
107
17.1 Analyzing the effect that different fibers and yarns have on design and color; 17.2 Describing resources for researching ideas for textile designs; 17.3 Planning original fabric designs that satisfy design specifications and are appropriate for the fabric and intended use; 17.4 Duplicating textile designs by using new colors; 17.5 Creating repeated designs, such as tessellations; 17.6 Identifying and explaining the limits of making designs reproducible and recommending changes; and 17.7 Evaluating techniques used to apply prints on different fabrics.
Standard 18 Garment Alteration and Repair Students will understand acceptable garment fit, alteration, and repair.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 18.1 Describing characteristics of properly fitted garments; 18.2 Explaining common fitting problems and their solutions; 18.3 Identifying alteration techniques required to satisfy a customer's specifications; 18.4 Estimating costs of repairs or alterations; 18.5 Performing alterations or repairs using appropriate techniques; 18.6 Analyzing fitting problems related to figure types and physical handicaps and recommending possible solutions to clients; 18.7 Performing various steps involved in properly fitting a customer's garments; 18.8 Using standard alteration marks to indicate where garments should be altered; 18.9 Preparing work orders that identify alterations or repairs; and 18.10 Evaluating the quality of alterations and repairs.
Standard 19 Care and Cleaning of Apparel Students will understand care and cleaning of apparel.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 19.1 Explaining the effects of laundering and dry cleaning on apparel; 19.2 Identifying sources of stains and recommending appropriate procedures for removal; and 19.3 Identifying cleaning procedures for a variety of fabrics.
108
Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising
Standard 20 Personal, Interpersonal, and Communication Skills Students will understand how personal, interpersonal, and communication skills influence employability.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 20.1 Describing interpersonal skills that enhance relationships at the work site, such as working cooperatively, communicating effectively, sharing responsibilities, and exercising leadership; 20.2 Analyzing the importance of such personal skills as a positive attitude, self-confidence, honesty, integrity, and self-discipline as these characteristics pertain to work, personal, and family life; 20.3 Explaining ways in which to resolve conflicts, use negotiation skills, and communicate resolutions across gender, age, and cultural groups; 20.4 Assessing the importance of effective nonverbal, oral, and written communication skills in getting and keeping a job; 20.5 Using appropriate communication skills, including correct telephone, facsimile, and e-mail etiquette; and 20.6 Interpreting nonverbal communication and responding appropriately.
Standard 21 Thinking and Problem-Solving Skills Students will exhibit critical and creative thinking, logical reasoning, and problem-solving skills.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 21.1 Identifying issues and problems in the fashion design, manufacturing, and merchandising industry and offering possible solutions; 21.2 Considering multiple options for completing work tasks and applying appropriate problem-solving strategies to work related-issues; and 21.3 Applying creative thinking skills to identify and present new ways to perform work effectively.
Standard 22 Balancing Personal, Family, and Work Responsibilities Students will understand management strategies needed to achieve balance in work, personal, and family life.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 22.1 Identifying and analyzing multiple roles as members of the workforce, families, and communities; 22.2 Identifying and analyzing resources that help in managing the responsibilities of multiple roles;
Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising
109
22.3 Identifying and applying management strategies needed to achieve balance in work and family roles; and 22.4 Evaluating effectiveness in balancing responsibilities at home and work.
Standard 23 Teamwork and Leadership Students will understand the teamwork and leadership concepts and skills needed to succeed in work, personal, family, and community life.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 23.1 Identifying, comparing, and analyzing the characteristics and benefits of teamwork, leadership, and citizenship in the workplace and community; 23.2 Defining leadership roles in work and community life; 23.3 Identifying and practicing strategies for effective teamwork, leadership, and citizenship in the workplace and community; 23.4 Developing skills in teamwork, leadership, and citizenship by participating in FHA-HERO activities; 23.5 Analyzing and using written and professional resources that help in developing skills in teamwork and leadership; and 23.6 Assessing how skills in teamwork and leadership enhance employability.
Home Economics Related Occupations
Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition
112
Over view of Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition California's fascination--some say obsession--with diet and nutrition has led to a quiet revolution in food science, dietetics, and nutrition.
Foods that are healthy, nutritious, tasty, and quick to prepare are being emphasized.
That interest has increased the importance of specialists in food science and nutrition/dietetics who translate their expertise in food composition and preparation into a growing career field.
Career possibilities range from dietary technician, food product developer, and nutritionist to food and drug inspector, dietitian, and food technologist.
Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition Program Preparation for the Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition career pathway cluster offers students a science-based foundation for careers in food technology, research, health care, and support services for maintaining healthy lifestyles.
Courses in a Home Economics Related Occupations (HERO) program, funded by a school district or regional occupational center program (ROCP), enable students to develop the knowledge, skills, attitudes, and behaviors necessary to succeed in this industry.
Students pursuing careers in this career pathway cluster study the industry and its regulations; food safety and sanitation; nutritional needs; dietary needs; food preferences and marketing; data and statistics; food preparation; food and nutrition counseling and analysis; research and development, quality analysis, and sensory evaluation; and food communications and public relations.
Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition students also learn employment and management skills.
FHA-HERO, a pre-professional organization for students, provides cocurricular leadership and career development opportunities in HERO instructional programs.
Effective programs incorporate FHA-HERO as a teaching strategy for developing interpersonal, leadership, citizenship, and career skills.
This HERO program serves as the capstone course in the secondary-level Home Economics Careers and Technology Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition career pathway sequence.
The program continues a course sequence that includes a Consumer and Family Studies Comprehensive Core and a specialized content area course in food and nutrition.
The shaded portion of Chart 7.1, "Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition Career
Chart 7.1
Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition Career Pathway Options Home Economics Related Occupations (HERO) Grades 11 and 12 HERO: District- or ROCP-Funded Programs Introduction to Teaching Careers (Optional) Careers in Education Careers in Child Development
Consumer and Family Studies (CFS) Grades 10, 11, and 12 CFS Specialized Courses
Grades 6­10 CFS Foundation Courses Child Development and Guidance Grades 9 and 10 CFS Core Courses
Consumer Education Life Management I* Economics for Living
Careers in Consumer Services
Community College Careers in Family and Human Services Four-Year College or University
Middle Grades Exploratory CFS Courses
Family Living and Parenting Education Life Management II* Fashion,Textiles, and Apparel Introduction to Fashion Careers (Optional)
Explorator y Home Economics Careers and Technology (Grades 6 and 7)
Careers in Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising Employment
Teen Living (Grade 8) Grades 10, 11, and 12 CFS Specialized Course
Nutritional Science
Careers in Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition Apprenticeship Careers in Food Ser vice and Hospitality
Parenting and Personal Relationships (Grades 7 and 8)
Individual and Family Health** Food and Nutrition *Focuses on managing work and family.
These courses are recommended for all career pathways.
**May be offered as part of several career pathways.
Introduction to Hospitality Careers (Optional) Careers in Hospitality, Tourism, and Recreation
Private Postsecondary Programs/Training
FHA-HERO leadership and career development are integral to the instructional program for grades 6­12.
Housing and Furnishings Environmental Design
Careers in Interior Design, Furnishings, and Maintenance
113
114
Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition
Pathway Options," illustrates a sample course sequence for Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition.
The appendix, "Overview of HECT Course Sequences, Grades Nine Through Twelve," provides additional information about the design of course sequences.
Characteristics and Use of the Content Standards The HERO Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition content standards build on the knowledge, skills, attitudes, and behaviors outlined in the Consumer and Family Studies food and nutrition content standards.
Employability and FHA-HERO leadership skills are integrated into the standards.
These standards are intended for use by secondary-level instructors and administrators to strengthen curriculum, instruction, and assessment.
Secondary-level instructors will also use these standards in collaborating with postsecondary instructors to articulate and sequence instruction, thereby eliminating unnecessary duplication of content at both levels of education.
See also the section "Use of the Content Standards," described in "Overview of Home Economics Careers and Technology Programs," at the beginning of this document.
The standards delineated in this section reflect content identified by representatives of the profession and by instructors of secondary and postsecondary courses in Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition programs.
Each content standard contains the following components: Title of the standard: The title of each standard identifies the concept addressed in the content.
Statement of the standard: Each standard addresses broadly what a student should know.
Benchmarks: Statements listed below each standard describe what students should be able to do to meet the broad standard.
Technical assistance and resources for implementing standards-based Home Economics Careers and Technology course sequences and programs in Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition are available from the Home Economics Careers and Technology Unit, Standards and High School Development Division, California Department of Education.
115
Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition Career Pathway Standards Listed below are the career pathway standards for the food science, dietetics, and nutrition industry.
Standard 1
Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition Industr y Awareness Students will understand the breadth of the food science, dietetics, and nutrition industry, including career opportunities and the role of this industry in local and state economies.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 1.1 1.2 1.3 Identifying the various career opportunities within segments of the food science, dietetics, and nutrition industry; Describing the roles and functions of the various segments of the food science, dietetics, and nutrition industry; Determining the economic contributions of the various segments of the food science, dietetics, and nutrition industry to local, state, and global economies; Investigating careers related to the industry and the education or training requirements; Describing career paths and strategies for obtaining employment and advancing in the food science, dietetics, and nutrition industry; Analyzing economic trends in the various segments of the food science, dietetics, and nutrition industry and comparing them with state and national economic trends; Identifying examples of ways in which information systems are used in the food science, dietetics, and nutrition industry; and Identifying the knowledge, skills, aptitudes, and behaviors that can be transferred to higher levels of employment within the career pathway or to other fields.
1.4 1.5 1.6
1.7 1.8
Standard 2
Professional Standards/Dignity of Work Students will understand what constitutes professional behavior, image, and standards.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 2.1 Describing a code of ethics and identifying components of professionalism, including integrity, initiative, confidentiality, and respect at the work site;
116
Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition Career Pathway Standards
2.2 2.3 2.4 2.5 2.6 2.7 2.8
Explaining the interdependence and importance of all jobs to the success of an organization; Describing and practicing professional and ethical behaviors; Identifying clothing, grooming, and personal hygiene appropriate for the job; Explaining ways in which on-the-job decisions can affect the quality of work; Describing job-related stress and strategies to manage stress; Explaining employers' and employees' rights and responsibilities; and Determining ways to maintain competency within the industry.
Standard 3
Workforce and Organizational Management Students will understand workforce and organizational management, including the roles and responsibilities of management and employees.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 3.1 Describing the outcomes of effective management, such as profitability, productivity, employment atmosphere, consumer and client satisfaction, and business growth; Explaining workforce management strategies, such as shared responsibilities, negotiation, planning, and decision making; Using effective workforce management strategies; Analyzing how workforce management strategies affect employees' actions; Identifying appropriate business procedures for food science, dietetics, and nutrition organizations, such as the use of business plans; spreadsheets for payroll and inventories; and other tools for budgets, recordkeeping, and correspondence with clients; and Describing the uses of technology in the various segments of the food science, dietetics, and nutrition industry.
3.2 3.3 3.4 3.5
3.6
Standard 4
Operational Procedures and Safety Practices Students will understand the operational procedures and safety practices specific to the work site, including handling equipment, maintaining work stations, and practicing safe work habits.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 4.1 4.2 Explaining the purpose of operational procedures; Using correct technical terms to describe the products, procedures, and equipment used in the food science, dietetics, and nutrition industry;
Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition Career Pathway Standards
117
4.3 4.4
Describing appropriate procedures for handling, cleaning, and maintaining the work station; Describing and performing operational procedures related to quality control, inventory control, maintenance, storage, security, shipping, receiving, billing, and payment as required by the job; Performing tasks, preparing forms, or writing work orders to requisition supplies and materials; Demonstrating accurate preparation and maintenance of records, correspondence, reports, and forms; Demonstrating knowledge of manual or automated systems and equipment; Describing types and causes of industry-related accidents; Demonstrating procedures to reduce and prevent accidents;
4.5 4.6 4.7 4.8 4.9
4.10 Explaining and demonstrating procedures, such as lifting and handling, to reduce and prevent accidents; 4.11 Describing procedures for handling accidents and emergencies; 4.12 Demonstrating correct procedures for completing and maintaining accident reports and records; and 4.13 Analyzing the purpose of and information in the Material Safety Data Sheets (MSDSs).
Standard 5
Laws and Regulations Affecting the Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition Industry Students will understand the laws and regulations that affect the food science, dietetics, and nutrition industry.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 5.1 5.2 Describing and complying with the laws and regulations affecting the food science, dietetics, and nutrition industry; Identifying local, state, and federal laws, regulations, and agencies established to protect employers, employees, customers, and others with special needs; Explaining employers' and employees' responsibilities and procedural requirements for complying with laws and regulations; Explaining how local, state, and federal regulations and laws are enforced by regulatory agencies, including the California Occupational Safety and Health Administration (Cal/OSHA); Identifying and explaining policies and procedures established by the employer; and
5.3 5.4
5.5
118
Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition Career Pathway Standards
5.6
Explaining regulatory and procedural requirements for employers and employees, including labor relations, personnel policies and procedures, and labor laws.
Standard 6
Food Safety and Sanitation Students will understand the standards and regulations for food safety and sanitary and safe work habits for food handling.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 6.1 6.2 6.3 6.4 6.5 Demonstrating safe and sanitary procedures in all food handling, including food storage, production, service, and cleanup; Demonstrating and maintaining standards in personal grooming and hygiene as required by health codes; Describing and following local, state, and federal sanitation regulations for food handling establishments; Identifying and analyzing types of food-borne illnesses and potential causes and methods of prevention; and Demonstrating sanitary procedures for cleaning and storing tools, appliances, and equipment.
Standard 7
Nutritional Needs Students will understand the nutritional needs of individuals throughout the life span, including digestion, absorption, metabolism, nutrient values, and food sources.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 7.1 7.2 7.3 7.4 7.5 7.6 Describing basic nutritional principles and concepts; Explaining the digestive process, including the role of hormones; Identifying the anatomy and functions of organs within the digestive system; Explaining the biochemical function of enzymes, fat hydrolysis, and metabolism; Analyzing the breakdown of nutrients during the digestive process; Recommending the appropriate nutrient intake (for example, calcium, protein, and vitamins) for individuals throughout the life span; and Researching and identifying the role of functional foods in meeting the nutritional needs of individuals.
7.7
Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition Career Pathway Standards
119
Standard 8
Dietar y Needs Students will understand dietary guidelines and food guides and their use in planning a healthy diet.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 8.1 8.2 Describing the Food Guide Pyramid and ways to use it in making dietary decisions; Describing the specific dietary guidelines provided by the American Heart Association, the American Cancer Society, and other nationally recognized health organizations; Planning diets that apply the concepts and principles of approved dietary guidelines and food guides; Evaluating popular diets for recommendations that are consistent with and contrary to approved dietary guidelines; Recommending balanced diets for individuals throughout the life span; and Recommending balanced diets to maintain, add, or lose weight safely.
8.3 8.4 8.5 8.6
Standard 9
Food Preferences and Marketing Students will understand factors influencing food preferences and marketing.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 9.1 Describing factors that affect food preferences; for example, a person's culture, religion, economic level, and social, psychological, and personal influences; Explaining how eating habits and food preferences are psychologically based; Comparing the food preferences of different cultures; Determining the relationship between socioeconomic status and marketing strategies and food selection by different income groups; Assessing how food preferences might differ according to changes in the life span; Evaluating the influence of food preferences on diet counseling, food marketing, and product development; Describing the role of sensory evaluation and consumer testing on food or product development and marketing; and Evaluating the impact of functional foods on product development and marketing.
9.2 9.3 9.4 9.5 9.6 9.7 9.8
120
Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition Career Pathway Standards
Standard 10 Data and Statistics Students will understand data and statistical analyses as required for careers in food science, dietetics, and nutrition.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 10.1 Explaining descriptive and elementary inferential tests; 10.2 Coding and entering data into a computer; 10.3 Operating statistical programs to analyze data; 10.4 Using statistical analysis to interpret data; and 10.5 Evaluating limitations of research.
Standard 11 Food Preparation Students will understand the preparation, presentation, and evaluation of food by following standardized formulas and procedures.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 11.1 Explaining cooking terms used in formulas and recipes; 11.2 Identifying tools, utensils, appliances, and equipment according to their functions; 11.3 Using correct procedures for measuring a variety of foods for weight and volume with both standard and metric equipment; 11.4 Practicing techniques for using knives safely; 11.5 Describing the proper use, care, and storage of tools, utensils, appliances, and equipment; 11.6 Organizing and maintaining individual work areas; 11.7 Assembling and preparing ingredients, equipment, tools, and supplies; 11.8 Analyzing information in recipes and formulas; 11.9 Converting recipes to increase and decrease a quantity; 11.10 Preparing a variety of foods and beverages by following recipes or instructions; 11.11 Describing how to hold or store food until it is needed; and 11.12 Presenting food for assessment.
Standard 12 Food and Nutrition Counseling and Analysis Students will understand how to assist dietitians in nutritional counseling, diet administration, and data collection.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 12.1 Describing the purpose and limitations of nutritional counseling;
Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition Career Pathway Standards
121
12.2 Describing the roles and responsibilities of assisting dietitians and nutritional counselors; 12.3 Determining professional ethics needed by dietitians and nutritional counselors; 12.4 Determining appropriate responses and answers to questions commonly asked by clients; 12.5 Demonstrating the ability to follow directions for accurately preparing dietary trays; 12.6 Recording dietary intake; 12.7 Maintaining accurate records; and 12.8 Using nutritional analysis software.
Standard 13 Research and Development, Quality Analysis, and Sensory Evaluation Students will understand the role of assisting food technologists in research and development, quality analysis, and sensory evaluation.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 13.1 Preparing product development formulas for testing; 13.2 Following test protocol based on defined constants and variables; 13.3 Following procedures to set up and maintain the test kitchen or food laboratory and its equipment and supplies; 13.4 Maintaining an inventory for equipment and supplies through the use of the computer; 13.5 Following procedures to order food and laboratory supplies; 13.6 Explaining the importance of quality assurance; 13.7 Describing the steps and procedures in maintaining quality assurance programs; 13.8 Describing the importance and methods of achieving random sampling; 13.9 Practicing procedures to obtain and label samples from a production line; 13.10 Collecting, preparing, and presenting samples for quality assurance review; 13.11 Explaining the purpose, scope, and importance of sensory evaluation; 13.12 Describing the steps necessary to conduct sensory evaluation; 13.13 Describing the research design, validity, reliability, and variables used for sensory evaluation;
122
Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition Career Pathway Standards
13.14 Setting up for sensory evaluation, including the portioning and plating of food and the serving sequence; 13.15 Collecting assessment devices and compiling data for analysis; 13.16 Maintaining accurate records of samples identified, panelist performances, and test conditions; 13.17 Using related software programs for testing; 13.18 Cleaning and sanitizing sensory testing areas and maintaining equipment; 13.19 Preparing and testing recipes for the development of new products and for consumer use; 13.20 Applying research findings of food trends to creative product development; and 13.21 Researching the discovery and significance of functional foods and the effects of phytochemicals.
Standard 14 Food Communications and Public Relations Students will understand current and emerging trends in food and nutrition, methods of communication, and ways to communicate accurate product information to consumers.
They will demonstrate proficiency by: 14.1 Explaining the importance of communicating accurate information to consumers; 14.2 Explaining and writing information and instructions on the use of products; 14.3 Describing the influence of consumer trends and expectations on product development and marketing; 14.4 Identifying and integrating trends into the design and marketing of consumer goods and services; 14.5 Differentiating between public relations and advertising; 14.6 Identifying and practicing communication methods that can be used to convey information to consumers; and 14.7 Explaining how consumers are influenced by public relations and advertising.
Standard 15 Personal, Interpersonal, and Communication Skills Students will understand how personal, interpersonal, and communication skills influence employability.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by:
Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition Career Pathway Standards
123
15.1 Describing interpersonal skills that enhance relationships at the work site, such as working cooperatively, communicating effectively, sharing responsibilities, and exercising leadership; 15.2 Analyzing the importance of such personal skills as a positive attitude, self-confidence, honesty, integrity, and self-discipline as these characteristics pertain to work, personal, and family life; 15.3 Explaining ways in which to resolve conflicts, use negotiation skills, and communicate resolutions across gender, age, and cultural groups; 15.4 Assessing the importance of effective nonverbal, oral, and written communication skills in getting and keeping a job; 15.5 Using appropriate communication skills, including correct telephone, facsimile, and e-mail etiquette; and 15.6 Interpreting nonverbal communication and responding appropriately.
Standard 16 Thinking and Problem-Solving Skills Students will exhibit critical and creative thinking, logical reasoning, and problem-solving skills.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 16.1 Identifying issues and problems in the food science, dietetics, and nutrition industry and offering possible solutions; 16.2 Considering multiple options for completing work tasks and applying appropriate problem-solving strategies to work-related issues; and 16.3 Applying creative thinking skills to identify and present new ways to perform work effectively.
Standard 17 Balancing Personal, Family, and Work Responsibilities Students will understand management strategies needed to achieve balance in work, personal, and family life.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 17.1 Identifying and analyzing multiple roles as members of the workforce, families, and communities; 17.2 Identifying and analyzing resources that help in managing the responsibilities of multiple roles; 17.3 Identifying and applying management strategies needed to achieve balance in work and family roles; and 17.4 Evaluating effectiveness in balancing responsibilities at home and work.
124
Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition Career Pathway Standards
Standard 18 Teamwork and Leadership Students will understand the teamwork and leadership concepts and skills needed to succeed in work, personal, family, and community life.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 18.1 Identifying, comparing, and analyzing the characteristics and benefits of teamwork, leadership, and citizenship in the workplace and community; 18.2 Defining leadership roles in work and community life; 18.3 Identifying and practicing strategies for effective teamwork, leadership, and citizenship in the workplace and community; 18.4 Developing skills in teamwork, leadership, and citizenship by participating in FHA-HERO activities; 18.5 Analyzing and using written and professional resources that help in developing skills in teamwork and leadership; and 18.6 Assessing how skills in teamwork and leadership enhance employability.
Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition Career Pathway Standards
125
Home Economics Related Occupations
Food Service and Hospitality
126
Over view of Food Service and Hospitality Careers with unlimited potential are available for those in the food service and hospitality industry--an industry that employs over 600,000 people in California alone.
People continue to spend more money on leisure activities, such as dining out and traveling, and on replacements for meals prepared at home.
Many opportunities are available for highly motivated and talented workers who want jobs in an industry that is expected to experience the largest growth in California through 2005.
Those entering this industry can work anywhere in the world in restaurants, hotels, clubs, resorts, catering services, hospitals, and institutions.
Food Ser vice and Hospitality Program Students pursuing a career in this industry study all aspects of the food service and hospitality industry, including food service laws and regulations; workforce and organizational management; safety regulations and emergency procedures; sanitation and food handling; tools, utensils, appliances, and equipment; facilities management; customer service and guest relations; nutrition; food and beverage production and preparation; food and beverage service; marketing and perceptions of and interactions with guests; prime cost analysis; profitability analysis; and entrepreneurship.
Food Service and Hospitality students also learn employment and management skills.
Courses in a Home Economics Related Occupations (HERO) program, funded by a school district or regional occupational center program (ROCP), enable students to develop the knowledge, skills, attitudes, and behaviors necessary to succeed in this industry.
FHA-HERO, a pre-professional organization for students, provides cocurricular leadership and career development opportunities in HERO instructional programs.
Effective programs incorporate FHA-HERO as a teaching strategy for developing interpersonal, leadership, citizenship, and career skills.
This HERO program serves as the capstone course in the secondary-level Home Economics Careers and Technology Food Service and Hospitality career pathway sequence.
The program continues a course sequence that includes a Consumer and Family Studies Comprehensive Core and a specialized content area course in food and nutrition.
The shaded portion of Chart 8.1, "Food Service and Hospitality Career Pathway Options," illustrates a sample course sequence for Food Service and Hospitality.
The appendix, "Overview of HECT Course Sequences, Grades Nine Through Twelve," provides additional information about the design of course sequences.
Chart 8.1
Food Service and Hospitality Career Pathway Options Home Economics Related Occupations (HERO) Grades 11 and 12 HERO: District- or ROCP-Funded Programs Introduction to Teaching Careers (Optional) Careers in Education Careers in Child Development
Consumer and Family Studies (CFS) Grades 10, 11, and 12 CFS Specialized Courses
Grades 6­10 CFS Foundation Courses Child Development and Guidance Grades 9 and 10 CFS Core Courses
Consumer Education Life Management I* Economics for Living
Careers in Consumer Services
Community College Careers in Family and Human Services Four-Year College or University
Middle Grades Exploratory CFS Courses
Family Living and Parenting Education Life Management II* Fashion, Textiles, and Apparel Introduction to Fashion Careers (Optional)
Exploratory Home Economics Careers and Technology (Grades 6 and 7)
Careers in Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising Employment
Teen Living (Grade 8) Nutritional Science Grades 10, 11, and 12 CFS Specialized Course
Careers in Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition Apprenticeship Careers in Food Service and Hospitality
Parenting and Personal Relationships (Grades 7 and 8)
Individual and Family Health** Food and Nutrition *Focuses on managing work and family.
These courses are recommended for all career pathways.
**May be offered as part of several career pathways.
Introduction to Hospitality Careers (Optional) Careers in Hospitality, Tourism, and Recreation
Private Postsecondary Programs/Training
FHA-HERO leadership and career development are integral to the instructional program for grades 6­12.
Housing and Furnishings Environmental Design
Careers in Interior Design, Furnishings, and Maintenance
127
128
Food Service and Hospitality
Characteristics and Use of the Content Standards The HERO Food Service and Hospitality content standards build on the knowledge, skills, attitudes, and behaviors outlined in the Consumer and Family Studies food and nutrition content standards.
Employability and FHA-HERO leadership skills are integrated into the standards.
These standards are intended for use by secondary-level instructors and administrators to strengthen curriculum, instruction, and assessment.
Secondarylevel instructors will also use these standards in collaborating with postsecondary instructors to articulate and sequence instruction, thereby eliminating unnecessary duplication of content at both levels of education.
See also the section "Use of the Content Standards," described in "Overview of Home Economics Careers and Technology Programs," at the beginning of this document.
The standards delineated in this section reflect content identified by representatives of the industry and by instructors of secondary and postsecondary Food Service and Hospitality education programs.
Each content standard contains the following components: Title of the standard: The title of each standard identifies the concept addressed in the content.
Statement of the standard: Each standard addresses broadly what a student should know.
Benchmarks: Statements listed below each standard describe what students should be able to do to meet the broad standard.
Technical assistance and resources for implementing standards-based Home Economics Careers and Technology course sequences and programs in Food Service and Hospitality are available from the Home Economics Careers and Technology Unit, Standards and High School Development Division, California Department of Education.
129
Food Service and Hospitality Career Pathway Standards
Listed below are the career pathway standards for the food service and hospitality industry.
Standard 1
Food Service and Hospitality Industry Awareness Students will understand the breadth of the food service and hospitality industry, including career opportunities and the role of this industry in local and state economies.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 1.1 1.2 1.3 1.4 1.5 Describing the contribution and impact of the food service industry on the state's economy; Comparing the functions and roles of the various segments of the food service and hospitality industry; Explaining various job titles and descriptions for positions in the food service industry; Explaining the importance of teamwork to the success of a food service organization; Describing the range of career opportunities, income, career paths, and strategies for obtaining employment and advancing in the food service and hospitality industry; Describing professional conduct and workplace culture in the food service industry; Assessing personal traits and skills required for careers in the food service and hospitality industry; Identifying the potential impact that careers in the food service and hospitality industry have on achieving a balance between personal and professional life; Explaining the benefits of joining professional and trade organizations that relate to the food service and hospitality industry;
1.6 1.7 1.8
1.9
1.10 Explaining the employers' and employees' responsibilities for carrying out regulations; and 1.11 Identifying the knowledge, skills, aptitudes, and behaviors that can be transferred to higher levels of employment in the career pathway or to other fields.
130
Food Service and Hospitality Career Pathway Standards
Standard 2
Professional Standards/Dignity of Work Students will understand what constitutes professional behavior, image, and standards.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 2.1 Describing a code of ethics and identifying the components of professionalism, including integrity, initiative, confidentiality, and respect at the work site; Explaining the interdependence and importance of all jobs to the success of an organization; Describing and practicing professional and ethical behaviors; Identifying clothing, grooming, and personal hygiene appropriate for the job; Explaining ways in which on-the-job decisions can affect the quality of work; Describing job-related stress and strategies to manage stress; Explaining employers' and employees' rights and responsibilities; and Determining ways to maintain competency within the industry.
2.2 2.3 2.4 2.5 2.6 2.7 2.8
Standard 3
Workforce and Organizational Management Students will understand workforce and organizational management, including the roles and responsibilities of management and employees.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 3.1 Describing the outcomes of effective management, such as profitability, productivity, employment atmosphere, consumer and client satisfaction, and business growth; Explaining workforce management strategies, such as shared responsibilities, negotiation, planning, and decision making; Using effective workforce management strategies; Analyzing how workforce management strategies affect employees' actions; Identifying appropriate business procedures for food service and hospitality organizations, such as the use of business plans; spreadsheets for payroll and inventories; and other tools for budgets, recordkeeping, and correspondence with clients; and Describing the uses of technology in the various segments of the food service and hospitality industry.
3.2 3.3 3.4 3.5
3.6
Food Service and Hospitality Career Pathway Standards
131
Standard 4
Safety Regulations and Emergency Procedures Students will understand safe work habits, security, and emergency procedures for employment in food service and hospitality establishments.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 4.1 4.2 4.3 4.4 4.5 4.6 4.7 4.8 Describing guidelines for the security of employees and guests; Describing the types and causes of accidents; Explaining and demonstrating procedures to reduce and prevent accidents; Demonstrating proper procedures for lifting; Describing procedures for handling accidents; Completing accident reports and records accurately; Explaining the procedures for preventing and tending to heat, electrical, and chemical burns; Explaining the role of the California Occupational Safety and Health Administration (Cal/OSHA) in regulating practices in the food service and hospitality industry; Describing procedures for emergencies and disasters; and
4.9
4.10 Analyzing the purpose of and information in the Material Safety Data Sheets (MSDSs).
Standard 5
Laws and Regulations Affecting the Food Service and Hospitality Industry Students will understand the laws and regulations that affect employers, employees, and customers.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 5.1 5.2 Describing and complying with the laws and regulations affecting the food service and hospitality industry; Identifying local, state, and federal laws, regulations, and agencies established to protect employees, employers, customers, and others with special needs; Explaining employers' and employees' responsibilities and procedural requirements for complying with laws and regulations; Explaining how local, state, and federal regulations and laws are enforced by regulatory agencies, including the California Occupational Safety and Health Administration (Cal/OSHA); and Identifying and explaining policies and procedures established by the employer.
5.3 5.4
5.5
132
Food Service and Hospitality Career Pathway Standards
Standard 6
Sanitation and Food Handling Students will understand the principles of sanitation and safe food handling.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 6.1 6.2 6.3 6.4 6.5 6.6 6.7 6.8 6.9 Describing specific principles of Hazard Analysis Critical Control Point (HACCP); Applying critical control points for time and temperature; Using safe and sanitary procedures in all food handling, including food receiving, storage, production, service, and clean up; Maintaining standards in personal grooming and hygiene as required by local, state, and federal health and safety codes; Describing and following local, state, and federal sanitation regulations for food service establishments; Describing types of food contamination, their potential causes, and methods of prevention; Analyzing cases of food-borne illnesses and describing potential causes and methods of prevention; Using appropriate procedures for sanitizing work surfaces and storing tools, utensils, appliances, and equipment; Applying chemicals, sanitizers, and cleaning agents to work stations, tools, utensils, appliances, and equipment; and
6.10 Describing the process for making flowcharts of recipes, from receiving the ingredients to preparing and serving the food.
Standard 7
Technology, Tools, Utensils, Appliances, and Equipment Students will understand the use of technology, tools, utensils, appliances, and equipment needed in food service production.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 7.1 7.2 7.3 7.4 7.5 Identifying technology, tools, utensils, appliances, and equipment according to their functions in food production; Describing proper use, care, and storage of tools, utensils, appliances, and equipment; Using food production equipment appropriately, while adhering to safety guidelines; Using computer applications in food production; and Describing emerging technology for the food service and hospitality industry.
Food Service and Hospitality Career Pathway Standards
133
Standard 8
Facilities Management Students will understand the operational procedures that result in a wellmaintained and clean physical plant.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 8.1 8.2 8.3 8.4 8.5 8.6 8.7 8.8 Explaining the importance of following operational checklists; Describing the repair and preventive maintenance of equipment; Explaining the relationship between preventive maintenance systems and food service operations; Organizing work and maintaining work stations for efficiency; Using correct technical terms to describe supplies for cleaning and maintenance; Using technology in the management of the food service and hospitality industry; Recycling materials where appropriate; and Packing and discarding trash and cleaning and inspecting the facility.
Standard 9
Customer Service and Guest Relations Students will understand factors that contribute to exceeding customers' and guests' expectations.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 9.1 9.2 9.3 9.4 9.5 9.6 9.7 9.8 9.9 Explaining principles of service for customers and guests; Using skills for listening, observing, and anticipating to determine the needs of customers and guests; Explaining how the behavior of all employees affects operational efficiency and the satisfaction of guests; Explaining ways in which management empowers employees to satisfy the needs of customers and guests; Identifying potential barriers and making reasonable accommodations for customers with disabilities; Anticipating and responding to requests or complaints from guests and customers; Describing options for responding to dissatisfied customers and guests; Answering customers' and guests' questions about the menu; Explaining and providing examples of up-selling and suggestive selling;
9.10 Determining and arranging with the customer the theme, decorations, style of service, tables, and entertainment for a catered event; and
134
Food Service and Hospitality Career Pathway Standards
9.11 Preparing and presenting checks to customers and guests and processing payments.
Standard 10 Nutrition Students will understand approved dietary guidelines and ways in which food preparation affects nutritional values.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 10.1 Describing nutritional principles and concepts; 10.2 Using food preparation techniques that conserve nutrients; 10.3 Interpreting nutritional or ingredient information from food labels and nutrition information sheets; and 10.4 Describing nutritional principles and concepts related to menu applications outlined in the American Dietetic Association (ADA) guidelines.
Standard 11 Food and Beverage Production and Preparation Students will understand food preparation in professional and institutional kitchens, including skills used by chefs, bakers, and caterers.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 11.1 Identifying and categorizing a variety of food and bakery ingredients; 11.2 Setting up and maintaining assigned work areas; 11.3 Applying the principle of mise en place (set in place) in assembling ingredients, tools, and supplies; 11.4 Measuring and weighing ingredients according to a recipe's specifications; 11.5 Preparing icings, fillings, and meringues; 11.6 Identifying and comparing types of flour, shortening, and leavening agents; 11.7 Preparing, decorating, and displaying bakery items, including breads and other baked items, and desserts, using appropriate procedures and techniques; 11.8 Preparing a variety of food items, including pastas, fruit and vegetable dishes, dairy-based products, soups, salads, meat, poultry, seafoods, sandwiches, and beverages; 11.9 Discussing the advantages and disadvantages of foods made from scratch and of convenience products in terms of cost, preparation, and quality; 11.10 Analyzing time and energy-saving products and techniques used to prepare food items;
Food Service and Hospitality Career Pathway Standards
135
11.11 Using a variety of food preparation and baking techniques that produce consistent products; 11.12 Accurately preparing recipes according to directions and procedures; 11.13 Displaying, selling, ordering, and restocking retail counter items as required by the job; 11.14 Identifying, using, and storing herbs, spices, and extracts properly; 11.15 Adjusting standard recipes and using correct computational skills to serve more or fewer persons than specified; 11.16 Using standard procedures in measuring and weighing solid and liquid foods; 11.17 Planning the production schedule so that foods are ready at serving time; 11.18 Designing and creating menus for special occasions as specified by the catering customer; 11.19 Estimating food, beverage, labor, and other costs; 11.20 Making a work sheet and assembling supplies for a catered event; 11.21 Holding and storing prepared foods, utensils, and equipment until needed; and 11.22 Maintaining the quality and safety of transported food and beverages.
Standard 12 Food and Beverage Service Students will understand the procedures and skills needed to perform sidework, serve customers, set up and clear tables, and process cash and credit transactions.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 12.1 Applying the concept of mise en place (set in place); 12.2 Holding or storing prepared foods and condiments until needed; 12.3 Describing opening, closing, change-of-shift, and preparatory work duties; 12.4 Identifying and using proper techniques for greeting, seating, and presenting menus to customers; 12.5 Using appropriate, effective, and efficient techniques for writing food and beverage orders and relaying orders to the kitchen through the use of manual or automated systems; 12.6 Using safe, efficient, and proper procedures for setting, serving, maintaining, and busing tables; 12.7 Portioning foods accurately during food preparation and service by using specified portioning tables; 12.8 Coordinating and assembling food orders and supplies;
136
Food Service and Hospitality Career Pathway Standards
12.9 Plating and garnishing foods attractively; 12.10 Presenting the bill to the customer, processing credit transactions, and making and counting back change; 12.11 Performing tasks and preparing forms to balance receipts as required by the employer; and 12.12 Describing the different types of table service; for example, American, French, and Russian.
Standard 13 Marketing Strategies Students will understand the purpose and strategies of marketing and the foundation of tactical marketing applications, including publicity, promotion, public relations, and product development.
The student will demonstrate content proficiency by: 13.1 Explaining the difference between vision and mission in the food service industry; 13.2 Defining marketing as it relates to the food service industry; 13.3 Explaining marketing strategies; 13.4 Differentiating among promotion, publicity, public relations, and product development; 13.5 Defining major forms of advertising; 13.6 Explaining feedback systems, including those from guests and employees; 13.7 Defining one-to-one marketing (word of mouth); and 13.8 Describing the process for conducting an analysis of competition.
Standard 14 Prime Cost Analysis Students will understand the process and importance of the costing process and cost analysis in the food service and hospitality industry.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 14.1 Describing the importance and structure of the Uniform System of Accounts for Restaurants; 14.2 Describing the key components of a profit and loss statement; 14.3 Explaining prime costs (food, beverages, labor) of income and expense statements; 14.4 Calculating recipe costs and pricing per portion; 14.5 Analyzing customer perception of value and its relationship to profit and loss;
Food Service and Hospitality Career Pathway Standards
137
14.6 Estimating the effect of portion control on waste and loss and its impact on profit and loss; and 14.7 Explaining controllable and occupational costs in the food service industry.
Standard 15 Profitability Analysis Students will understand the interrelationships among all cost groups: prime costs, marketing, administration, rent, energy, music, and entertainment.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 15.1 Describing the components of a statement of income and expense (profit and loss); 15.2 Describing the cost per cover; 15.3 Describing theoretical costing; 15.4 Listing the individual items that are included in occupational costs; and 15.5 Describing the importance of the menu as the primary source of revenue generation and cost control.
Standard 16 Entrepreneurship Students will understand the principles of conceptualizing, establishing, and operating a business.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 16.1 Researching and interpreting market conditions to establish a business; 16.2 Investigating available resources that help in setting up small businesses; 16.3 Describing the components of a business plan; 16.4 Identifying factors that affect success or failure in food service and hospitality businesses; 16.5 Outlining steps in setting up and starting a business; and 16.6 Describing the role that human resources play in the success of a small business.
Standard 17 Personal, Interpersonal, and Communication Skills Students will understand how personal, interpersonal, and communication skills influence employability.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 17.1 Describing interpersonal skills that enhance relationships at the work site, such as working cooperatively, communicating effectively, sharing responsibilities, and exercising leadership;
138
Food Service and Hospitality Career Pathway Standards
17.2 Analyzing the importance of such personal skills as a positive attitude, self-confidence, honesty, integrity, and self-discipline as these characteristics pertain to work, personal, and family life; 17.3 Explaining ways in which to resolve conflicts, use negotiation skills, and communicate resolutions across gender, age, and cultural groups; 17.4 Assessing the importance of effective nonverbal, oral, and written communication skills in getting and keeping a job.
17.5 Using appropriate communication skills, including correct telephone, facsimile, and e-mail etiquette; and 17.6 Interpreting nonverbal communication and responding appropriately.
Standard 18 Thinking and Problem-Solving Skills Students will exhibit critical and creative thinking, logical reasoning, and problem-solving skills.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 18.1 Identifying issues and problems in the food service and hospitality industry and offering possible solutions; 18.2 Considering multiple options for completing work tasks and applying appropriate problem-solving strategies to work-related issues; and 18.3 Applying creative thinking skills to identify and present new ways to perform work effectively.
Standard 19 Balancing Personal, Family, and Work Responsibilities Students will understand management strategies needed to achieve balance in work, personal, and family life.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 19.1 Identifying and analyzing multiple roles as members of the workforce, families, and communities; 19.2 Identifying and analyzing resources that help in managing the responsibilities of multiple roles; 19.3 Identifying and applying management strategies needed to achieve balance in work and family roles; and 19.4 Evaluating effectiveness in balancing responsibilities at home and work.
Food Service and Hospitality Career Pathway Standards
139
Standard 20 Teamwork and Leadership Students will understand the teamwork and leadership concepts and skills needed to succeed in work, personal, family, and community life.
They will demonstrate content proficiency by: 20.1 Identifying, comparing, and analyzing the characteristics and benefits of teamwork, leadership, and citizenship in the workplace and community; 20.2 Defining leadership roles in work and community life; 20.3 Identifying and practicing strategies for effective teamwork, leadership, and citizenship in the workplace and community; 20.4 Developing skills in teamwork, leadership, and citizenship by participating in FHA-HERO activities; 20.5 Analyzing and using written and professional resources that help in developing skills in teamwork and leadership; and 20.6 Assessing how skills in teamwork and leadership enhance employability.
Home Economics Related Occupations
Hospitality,Tourism, and Recreation
142
Over view of Hospitality, Tourism, and Recreation Opportunities abound in the hospitality, tourism, and recreation industry.
The widespread existence of this industry makes it possible to work anywhere in the world in one of its three segments: lodging, travel services, and recreation.
California continues to be a popular tourist destination, and projected growth in the industry provides short-term and long-term variety and stability for persons making this career choice.
Just a few of the numerous options include serving a specific clientele as a social director or travel guide, serving as a cast member in an amusement park, organizing events as a meeting planner, or managing a hotel or bed-and-breakfast establishment.
Hospitality, Tourism, and Recreation Program Students pursuing a career in hospitality, tourism, and recreation study all aspects of the industry, including workforce and organizational management; policies and procedures; laws and regulations; customer and guest information and services; information systems; sales and marketing; facility operations and task management; financial transactions; destinations; reservations and ticketing; itineraries; international travel; theme parks, attractions, and exhibitions; event planning; and outdoor recreation management.
Hospitality, Tourism, and Recreation students also learn employment and management skills.
Courses in a Home Economics Related Occupations (HERO) program, funded by a school district or regional occupational center program (ROCP), enable students to develop the knowledge, skills, attitudes, and behaviors necessary to succeed in this industry.
FHA-HERO, a pre-professional organization for students, provides cocurricular leadership and career development opportunities in HERO instructional programs.
Effective programs incorporate FHA-HERO as a teaching strategy for developing interpersonal, leadership, citizenship, and career skills.
This HERO program serves as the capstone course in the secondary-level Home Economics Careers and Technology Hospitality, Tourism, and Recreation career pathway sequence.
The program continues a course sequence that includes a Consumer and Family Studies Comprehensive Core and a specialized content area introductory course to the industry.
The shaded portion of Chart 9.1, "Hospitality, Tourism, and Recreation Career Pathway Options," illustrates a sample course sequence for Hospitality, Tourism, and Recreation.
The appendix, "Overview of HECT Course
Chart 9.1
Hospitality,Tourism, and Recreation Career Pathway Options Home Economics Related Occupations (HERO) Grades 11 and 12 HERO: District- or ROCP-Funded Programs Introduction to Teaching Careers (Optional) Careers in Education Careers in Child Development
Consumer and Family Studies (CFS) Grades 10, 11, and 12 CFS Specialized Courses
Grades 6­10 CFS Foundation Courses Child Development and Guidance Grades 9 and 10 CFS Core Courses
Consumer Education Life Management I* Economics for Living
Careers in Consumer Services
Community College
Middle Grades Exploratory CFS Courses
Family Living and Parenting Education Life Management II* Fashion, Textiles, and Apparel Introduction to Fashion Careers (Optional)
Careers in Family and Human Services Four-Year College or University Careers in Fashion Design, Manufacturing, and Merchandising Employment
Exploratory Home Economics Careers and Technology (Grades 6 and 7)
Teen Living (Grade 8) Nutritional Science Grades 10, 11, and 12 CFS Specialized Course
Careers in Food Science, Dietetics, and Nutrition Apprenticeship Careers in Food Service and Hospitality
Parenting and Personal Relationships (Grades 7 and 8)
Individual and Family Health** Food and Nutrition *Focuses on managing work and family.
These courses are recommended for all career pathways.
**May be offered as part of several career pathways.
Introduction to Hospitality Careers (Optional) Careers in Hospitality, Tourism, and Recreation
Private Postsecondary Programs/Training
FHA-HERO leadership and career development are integral to the instructional program for grades 6­12.
Housing and Furnishings Environmental Design
Careers in Interior Design, Furnishings, and Maintenance
143
144
Hospitality, Tourism, and Recreation
Sequences, Grades Nine Through Twelve," provides additional information about the design of course sequences.
Characteristics and Use of the Content Standards The HERO Hospitality, Tourism, and Recreation content standards build on the knowledge, skills, attitudes, and behaviors outlined in the Consumer and Family Studies food and nutrition; child care and guidance; family living and parenting education; housing and furnishings; and consumer education content standards.
Employability and FHA-HE
